yup.. same kind that the make up artists use.
Min 10: “People in Germany are reading…and Austria. Wait, I thought they were the same place. They’re not the same place? Oh christ, the Europeans can feel my shitty American public school education reeking through this blog and that’s why they’re not reading…wait, they are reading.”
Pain (Subjective experience of)
9. Florence and the Machine “Shake It Out”
What about those with other sexual orientations? What would help them to feel fully accepted? Don't they have a right to "full inclusion" if they attest that they are in a committed monogamous relationship?
Fyrinnae - Oberon (applied to outer lid and V with MAC 217)
You see we started obedience classes last week. John and I came with a small bag of treats and soon realized as the trainer said (ok say your dogs name and give them a treat when they look at you... 10 times in a row), that the treats I brought were way too huge and I sure didn't bring enough with us!
We had chosen a really cheap hostel because we didn’t want to spend a lot of money. It had been recommended to us by a friend at DIS, however.. I’m not sure WHAT they saw in the place, other than that the staff was really friendly. Here are my impressions: the neighborhood was incredibly sketchy (including a few corner stores, apartments, an erotic massage parlor, a hookah store and street lights only on one side of the street), the men (or should I say, boys) we encountered in the kitchen within an hour of arrival were self-righteous male chauvinists who thought that it was completely acceptable to be sloppily drunk by 22.00 and proceed to hit on anything with a mouth and boobs (it’s not acceptable ever, I don’t care if you’re european; those guys were disgusting), we were staying in a 5-bed mixed dorm with complete strangers, the room smelled like feet, and.. well.. the place wasn’t that clean. Definitely not the kind of place you really want to kick off your shoes and curl up in the blankets in – I slept on my credit cards and phone that night. At my request, we booked a private room ensuite for the following three nights, and I only had to stick it out one night in the slightly sketchy room (Maybe I’m spoiled, but I’d like to see you live in a place like that and not gag a few times).
And every time I step up
15 Never Stop
But before the game we first learnt about the Equator, Tropics and Arctic and Antarctic circles and North and South Poles.
A really-really-ugly long brown leather skirt showed up at our local thrift shop. I spent a whole dollar on it -- and I can only hope I didn't look too greedy as I snatched it up! Shortly after, my mother-in-law passed along an orange leather jacket that someone had passed along to her. It was a Coldwater Creek jacket in great shape -- can you imagine the guilt I felt as I cut it apart? *shiver* But it was a necessary sacrifice.
We thought we would stop by and say hello to our friend and maybe play a game with the children.
as all the chains will disappear!
John is a literary agent looking for Children's, Middle Grade, and Young Adult fiction. He’s also an author. I've just finished reading his YA novel, Girl Parts and LOVED IT. Also, check out his short story Abandon Changes. If he wasn't busy enough, John is also the managing editor for Armchair/Shotgun , a biannual journal that publishes fiction, non-fiction, and poetry.
After the pie incident, and on the completion of all of the questioning, James Murdoch was asked at Q 413 by Mr Watson “When you signed off the Taylor payment, did you see or were you made aware of the full Neville email, the transcript of the hacked voicemail messages?” (The uncorrected transcript of proceedings is the source for these extracts ) (The Taylor payment refers to the settlement of a claim of phone hacking against the NotW by Gordon Taylor, head of the Professional Footballers’ Association, where James Murdoch authorised a payment of £700,000 including costs to conclude the matter. The “Neville” referred to was a former chief reporter for the NotW who received an email containing transcripts of many of Taylor’s phone conversations.)
I am a talented liar, a good sneak, and I thought I was invincible, that I would never be caught, never made to be accountable for anything. My life was just that, mine, and I didn’t feel that anybody else in the world had the right to tell me how to live. But what if I was wrong?
Mandy: Hey, Steven! Guess what?! I'm getting married!!
Lake of the Ozarks MO, Jefferson City MO , Fort Smith AR , north of Little rock all the way to Saint Louis Missouri … also Kansas City south to Joplin… prepare now.
Stop this madness
And the final good is that it's Friday and hopefully this long week can be put behind me. My aunt is very sick, but surgery went WELL. I do have tonsillitis, but it's now the weekend and I can relax and recuperate. Bryce is gone, but he'll be home tomorrow and it's probably best to be with my family right now.
Potato, 1 pc, cut into bite size
“But then many lives have been sacrificed all over the world even to this very day to fight for their respective community’s rights and the sanctity of the beliefs and honour of their country.
Use egg whites matured in the refrigerator for 2 to 3 days for best results. I brought them to room temperature before using though.
I am nearly to the end of the beam when I feel it shudder. They have caught up, but I don’t dare a glance back. I can not risk getting caught. I would welcome the ground with open arms- it would take only one little step- before I would let them touch me.
Four wheels scare the cockatoos
The Spring Festival organized by SHAMS Association and Culture Resource (Al Mawred Al Thaqafy) is a celebration of international modern creativity. This year’s festival has already seen Turkish shadow puppeteers, and Dutch and Turkish musicians all take to the stage of Beirut’s Sunflower Theatre. The festival is still young – American and Lebanese dancers; Iranian, Tajikistani, Dutch, British and Zanzibarian musicians; and Tunisian thesps, are yet to come.
Serve with tortilla chips or saltine crackers.
Your endearing friend,
There’s plenty of fantastic characters and the mystery unravels slowly and powerfully and when it’s all finally out in the open, the “curse of Fenric” manages to be exactly what you thought it was and then so much more beyond it.
Those are some of our pears in the jars. I ended up with 18 quart jars of dehydrated pear slices. Also, see that beautiful apple! That's the biggest apple that we harvested this year. It was too pretty to turn into applesauce, so it was set aside for eating fresh.
You trained your scented roses
I love the temple because Dad loved it first. He attends the temple once every week and has for years. When I went through the temple I knew that I was suppose to go every week because that's what Dad did. I now have my own testimony of the importance of temple work.
I’m being honest here. You can decide whether it’s factual.
We've seen all this before in our history and we know that it was wrong. I think that in a lot of ways it still continues today. We have a lot of inequality of circumstance. People don't choose to be born one colour or another, they don't choose the religion that they grow up in and they don't choose their initial economic circumstances. It's therefore unfair to judge them or to oppress them based on the circumstances of their birth. The same applies to people on the spectrum and indeed all people who were born with conditions which differentiate them from "normality".
A New Creation Week
Not often that happens!
I've come to think of the Harris County Criminal Justice Center as Grand Central Station for Houston's misery, an opinion that was only hardened when I recently spent a few mornings observing our courts handle jail inmates charged with misdemeanors.
But something that you have to discuss and talk about is the relationship between House/Wilson. He said:
Ian MacKaye’s former group, Minor Threat, coined the term and eventual subcultural movement, Straight Edge; a lifestyle philosophy that abstains from the use of alcohol, drugs and promiscuous sex. These ideals are outlined lyrically in the Minor Threat tracks, Straight Edge and Out of Step (Khanna, 2007). This philosophy was carried on in the next MacKaye incarnation, Fugazi. Fugazi not only empowered these ideals but also insisted on only performing at venues that allowed entry to persons of all ages and walks of life. Singer/Guitarist Guy Picciotto stated in Our Band Could Be Your Lifethat “Everyone has to be able to come in. We don’t discriminate against people. If you were fourteen, you weren’t allowed to into a place to enjoy bands. So we just vowed in blood that we would never do the same thing to other kids” (Azerrad, 2001). No alcohol or drugs of any kind were to be consumed or sold at these performances. Fugazi were so adamant about their disassociation with these adult vices that any interviews of the group could not and would not be displayed in magazines that contained advertisements for alcohol and nicotine products (Azerrad, 2001). This gave the group an ageless aesthetic that everyone could relate to which provided a juxtaposed alternative to the sexed up hair metal and junkie crazed grunge bands during Fugazi’s active years. Along with these clean ideals was a punk DIY influence that infected their business practices and touring schedules. The rejection of selling any merchandise (clothing, items, albums etc) on tour meant their only focus was solely their live performances in which Fugazi have become infamous for keeping their entry price to $5. As the band grew in popularity and financial inflation increased, Fugazi stuck to this low concert fee (Khanna, 2007). All records were released through MacKaye’s own label, Dischord to avoid collaborating with any major label that may compromise the band’s brand, sound or ethics (Azerrad, 2001).
After this eventful afternoon, we had a small window of opportunity to walk around Old Town Alexandria and to visit a large wharf along the Potomac River. It was indeed a wonderful experience to soak up the beauty and history of the area. Our time in the area was capped off by a delicious send-off dinner at a lovely Italian restaurant. Our team is really gelling and well-focused for the mission that lies ahead in Zambia. We all look forward to a profound, life-changing experience.
most likely inspired his gold technique and
Of course, I fell into the details of Chinatown like a person on a carb-restricted diet falls into a plate of pasta...and devours it! This page was done in the studio where I could savor each small detail as much and as long as I wanted. It also caused me to fall away from sketching for a few days, but more on that later.
My bags are packed, I’m ready to go, but I have a few minutes before I have to start donning my traveling togs, so I thought I’d say good-bye. Unlike Mary Travers, I do know when I’ll be back again — late Sunday night. I’m going to take notes and photos to show you, but most of all, despite 100% humidity (yikes!!), I’m going to have fun. It’s been so long since I’ve had fun, I’m not even sure what the word means any more, but I intend to find out.
I should take pictures instead of writing a story. I'm ridiculous.
Gipiemme seatpost (27.2mm).
Refuse to acknowledge a man trying to give you parking instructions unless it is a good looking Pashtun.
"Well, sure," says the patrolman, "But the limit is one per day, And you can't BAIT EM!!"
It wasn't quite that narrow, from the standpoint of Europe. Even taking into account Bosnia/Serbia, Chechenya, and some of the anti-Soviet uprisings in the captive states total European casualties from 1945 until, well, now have been trivial compared to the cataclysms that engulfed the continent from 1914-1945. You are right though that the conflicts were essentially pushed out to the Third World.
Ok, doesn't the cord/belly button transition look weird? It's different than what I thought it would be. I don't know, I guess I expected the cord to be attached right to the belly. Or something.
I would suggest looking elsewhere for your CIS.
Mtskheta was the main site of early Christian activities in Georgia and was the place where Christianity was proclaimed the state religion of the country in 337 AD, making them second only to Armenia in this regard. In the 6th century, the Jvari Monastery was built on top of a hill overlooking the rivers and Mtskheta and, in the 11th century, the Svetitskhoveli Cathedral was built in the middle of the old capital. Both of these religious structures are amongst the most significant monuments of Georgian Christian architecture and were among the “Historical Monuments of Mtskheta” as declared by the UNESCO World Heritage Sites in 1994. The city continued to serve as the coronation and burial place for most kings of Georgia until the end of the kingdom in the 19th century and it still remains the headquarters of the Georgian Orthodox and Apostolic Church to this day.
sweat discreetly. They mostly look like the examples here: I've also found a great selection of them at Ulta - though not many on the website, mostly in the stores. Attach a pin or a flower, and I'm good to go.
A MESS.
Over the past year, Americans’ views of Egypt have deteriorated significantly. A Gallup poll a year ago found favorable ratings had dropped from 58 percent in 2010 to 40 percent a year later, with more Americans having a negative than a positive view of Egypt for the first time since Gallup began polling the issue in 1991.
And we need to give her a chance at a job.
Love the leather jacket and the mystery behind this Doctor. How did we get from 8 to 9? What guilt is he bearing for the Time War? Its a wonderful, complicated, emotional Doctor.
You won't read about us in the newspaper
4. What does your mom do during the day?
Then, in June, Cole made Pittsburgh. In his first outing, Cole came into the game, the Pirates down 6-1. By the time he was done, Cole was charged with four runs of his own over 1.1 innings of work.
The forest canopy
A friend tipped me off to these and I think they are the best idea ever! So pretty and a great learning tool for both ABC's and scripture memorization. And I think they would make the best gift. I'm considering a DIY version, but can't decide if it would be too muc
Message me if you have any questions about this! I could go on and on about how I did this. All in all, it looks FABULOUS and I spent less than $60 on the project.
A baby wearing Gabriel’s crest…
My mother, glowing and thrilled in a yellow silk dress last time, is now in a nursing home with dementia and did not attend. My stepmother, with whom I always had a tough relationship, has been dead for four years. My Dad, healthy and strong at 82, looked fab in a bow-tie and double-breasted navy blazer, his new partner Mary, in a saffron yellow silk jacket — just back from Hong Kong and the marriage of her daughter.
when we grasp the intricacy, beauty, and subtlety of life,
I've been writing about Compassion, recently. Feel free (again) to have a look at the websites and think about sponsoring a child yourself! I know of at least one other family that did so, after reading my previous post about Compassion. I'd love to hear from more people who are planning to! Or from people who already have a sponsor child!
The two photo's above are the same, As you can tell.
5. The importance of knowledge is seen in that we “have escaped the pollutions of the world through the knowledge of the Lord …” (2 Pet. 2:20).
For work we had a Halloween party and had to dress up as a movie character. I chose to be Alice from the Disney cartoon version of Alice in Wonderland. This costume was actually made on the evening of Sunday October 30th, the night before Halloween. I must say I am impressed that I finished this! For this costume I used McCall's 4948. Materials wise I used 4 yds of light blue moleskin that has been in my stash for years, 5.5 yds white Kona cotton, 3 yds 1.5" wide white satin ribbon, 6 yds of 1/2" horsehair braid and 1 22" blue zipper. I made a few changes to this pattern. First, I added a collar to the neckline since Alice's dress has one. I also added .5" in length to the bodice and took off 4" from the skirt length. I redrafted the back of the skirt using the pattern from the front so that the gathers would be more even throughout the dress. Lastly, I added a couple of layers of the cotton for and underskirt to match Alice's but also to give the dress a little more fullness. All layers of the skirt were then hemmed using the horsehair braid to give it the wavy look. I love this costume! So much so that I am kinda sad I will probably only wear it the one time.
Were they chosen for a reason? Are they guilty of some crime? Are they being punished? Are they dead? Is the Cube even real? The film doesn’t solve any of those questions; it may not even have any answers. Maybe the answers are all “maybe”. The filmmakers don’t even offer a cop out, but no one could expect an audience not to ask. Cube is, after all, a small-scale project with “low budget cult film” stamped all over it, a locked room murder mystery of sorts, granted its only scope by the ideas of inquiry.
Who turned the light off?
All those plain old goats on the ground calendars should hang their heads in shame. Buy a few extra calendars for unexpected guests that are fans of tree-dwelling goats. (Amazon)
That reminded me of a time at band camp. A girl had a notebook in which she rated all the guys from 1-10. It got confiscated by one of the guys, who proceeded to read the list out loud.
Toss diced vegetables into pot. Cover with broth. Heat on medium. Once soup comes to a boil, add corn & red pepper flakes & stir. Reduce heat, cover and simmer for 25 minutes.
The Tele Vue philosophy (Ethos, if you will) has always been about inspiring “spacewalk” vistas by creating the finest “rich field” refractors and wide angle eyepieces. Tele Vue hopes the introduction of this new Ethos eyepiece will further rekindle the appreciation of astronomy and support all the worthy goals of IYA 2009.
Try to think back to yesterday and see if you can recall everything you ate and drank. Every little taste, bite, snack, or sip that crossed your lips. Chances are you’d probably forget an item or two, and most likely underestimate what you consumed. That’s pretty normal in today’s society where we’re constantly eating on the go or dining with distractions. Seldom do we sit down at a table and spend 20-30 minutes solely focused on enjoying our meals without the T.V., computer, tablet, phone, or road diverting our attention.
Thankfully, maternity scoop-front skirt patterns abound, so those wishing to recreate one can. And readers, I have! Please keep an open mind and recognize that I consider this project more cultural anthropology than maternity fetish.
The nation is buoyant and rugby captain Sam Warburton said: “It’s a great time to be Welsh. We’re doing well, Swansea are impressing in the Premiership and Cardiff pushing for promotion so it’s not just one sport.
After Googling a bit, I found some articles (here and here) that seemed to say that feminism actually benefits relationships. Because it creates a somewhat level playing field in the relationship where both partners could have some level of control. Each partner being able to act independently makes them a whole person, and they're able to bring that whole person to the relationship.
Significantly, discursive formations do not simply disappear from bodily movements, reflexes, and contagious transmissions. On the contrary, discourse is transmitted along with the prediscursive emergences of faces and stances. There is nonetheless an analytical requirement to map the changes in connectivities of prediscursive spaces and explore contemporary Tardean mediascapes, like the Internet, which as Thrift argues “act as new kinds of neural pathways . . . forging new reflexes.”(Thrift, Non-representational Theory, 236).
If you’d like to know more about resilience I highly recommend Brene’ Brown. A good place to start is her youtube clips but I have loved every chapter of The Gifts of Imperfection.
Whenever I would attend a party hosted by a blogger, I would always ask: is he here? Alas, as I discovered, nobody knows who he is.
But presumably most people would accept phone hacking, secretly recording and secretly filming is entirely acceptable to expose some people’s criminal acts: murderers, paedophiles and fraudsters, for example.
I swear I've been pregnant for years. I'm rarely comfortable. I haven't been sleeping well. I'm over it. I want my body back and to lose this weight. Yada, yada.
The doctor stayed on the line. “Can you tell me what make of car your son drives?”
Bad idea: Thinking you can do your part by spitting your gum into some toilet tissue while you go pee and then using the tissue to wipe without ensuring you've completely encased the gum within said tissue.
Time for some candy. It's been a while so I thought I'd share a few yummy things with you! Okay so here's what is included ...
Tricia from Lil Miss Crafty Pants has been kind enough to offer 1 lucky winner a Large Fleece Soaker/Diaper Cover in their choice of print! You will get to chose boy, girl, or gender neutral. Thank you so much Tricia for all your help and kindness in helping to celebrate Baby K's 1st Birthday1!!
Children listen to me, “many of you are spending too much time watching television, you are spending too much time playing games, you must learn to work, the world is not a bed of roses, there is a lot of struggling going on and those who will work hard will make it to the top. If your parents are the type that will push you, glory be to God”.
I have noticed that I have had a change in scents that I prefer since my chemo treatment, and the scents that used to be my signature scents now seem not quite right to me. The scent hasn’t changed, just how I perceive them.
I'd love feedback on what you think about the goals I've set for myself. Do you have suggestions of how I can achieve them? Do you have goals yourself for June? I love comments :) Then again, who with a blog doesn't?!
After several patents appeared online Nikon has officially revealed a new 28mm f/1.8, successor to the AI-S 28mm f/2.0 from 1981 (and a superb performer optically that was generally underrated because of the focal length). I used to have one and it was a better performer optically than either the AI-S 35mm f2.0 and even the vaunted 35mm f/1.4, which I also owned. It was left on a F2AS permanently in preference to those lenses but it couldn't matched by any other wide-angle in Nikon's range.
what I eat
She was driving her way back to home. “I should let go. I should learn to let go. Why cant I accept the fact that I can loose something or someone?” She never realized when she took a wrong turn. She was now on the wrong way on a ONE WAY elliptical ramp. When she saw the huge truck coming right into her, she had only few seconds to react. She shouted as her car skid on the ramp border. The roaring horn of the truck alerted a cop patrolling nearby. Her car was upside down. The truck stopped and the driver called 911 for emergency. The cop switched on the police lights and blocked the ramp.
was only a pilot light
Mercifully, the rain held off on my walk south despite switching from bucketing to heavy all afternoon (and getting soaked at lunchtime in the process). I arrived and had a Crabbies whilst settling in to play the quiz machine (ended up breaking even). Joey arrived with a bag full of Hotel Chocolat treats and when added to my pastries, we must have had over 4,000 calories on the table at the very least. We had the usual catch up, ate burgers, pies and more pies. In total, nine people turned up so Yoshi’s Island was supported by Keira Knightley’s Stunt Thighs.
Time will tell and I guess we can all stay tuned!
Callick, Rowan “Sri Lanka urges hard line on Tamil asylum-seekers,” Australian, 18 Oct. 2010.
Upstairs are two artists’ studios. In one is a textile artist, creating hats, scarves and other items to be worn, while the other is home to an artist exploring drawing practices. It is always interesting to see behind the scenes, to see how people organise their work spaces and explore, develop and create art work. It was a pity they weren’t working, but it did give us an opportunity to snoop about.
Curry leaves - 4 sprigs
- Monogram Canvas with natural leather trim and Golden hardware, sometime will comes with silver hardware
The presentation also has a redacted affidavit from a 20+ year
The European Journal of Open, Distance and E-Learning
so… why do I blog and why should YOU blog?
5. Others
NYC Council Member Letitia James
and wire shelf that was not very practical.
Sam: Your perfume.
Not to look at the clock and see if it is time to wake up.
You'll find yourself ooohing and aahhhing over her beautiful creations.
Anyway try it. And don't forget that the end of this month is coming fast. You have a few days left to purchase your IMAGE A DAY IN MAY at Sqjuigglefly. Check it out, don't just ignore it. It's beautiful new digis not yet shown and never will be priced so low again. Less than $1 a day for great digis arriving in your email box every morning in May!
1830 The Canterbury and Whitstable Railway (Kent) was opened. Sometimes referred to colloquially as the Crab and Winkle Line, it was the first steam hauled passenger railway to issue season tickets. It used cable haulage by stationary steam engines over much of its length, with steam locomotives restricted to the level stretch.
He knew that as developers made their way around the islands, shark habitat would continue to be whittled away. These big creatures were magnificent in their own right and vital to the naturally replenishing system that surrounded the coral. If the sharks went, so would the bountiful ecosystem that fed the locals and kept outsiders coming back to the islands to fish, to dive, to write, to dream.
Pete Savino
Where do I even start with Caya (the baby - 6)? She was my hardest pregnancy, my unhappiest baby and the moodiest 6 yr old I've ever seen. She's my baby though. LOL Her favorite character is Tinkerbell, which suits her right to the ground. Super super cute and so sweet one minute and then screaming and throwing a tantrum the next. I don't know how many times I've heard her utter the words (whining & screaming) "I KNEW today wasn't going to be a good day!!!!!!!!!!!!", while I watch her storm into her bedroom.
Tenderhearted Southern girl, Anna Whitt, was born with the sixth sense to see and feel emotions of other people. She’s aware of a struggle within herself, an inexplicable pull toward danger, but it isn’t until she turns sixteen and meets the alluring Kaidan Rowe that she discovers her terrifying heritage, and her will-power is put to the test. He’s the boy your daddy warned you about. If only someone had warned Anna.
I’m nothing but your humbled vassal.
grilled anchovies
But when you write a kids’ book with an Asian hero, you’ll have a bookseller come up to you and say ‘I can’t see anyone in my area buying you book because we’ve not got any Indians living around us.’
Of course, if you think about the state of the news-aggregating blogosphere, most of them are just spiking their punchlines with current events. Headlines being the punchlines in a link-don't-tell culture. So, you see, Hip Hop had a sense of integrity about page views and SEO before the internet even existed (in a popular, functional sense). That's why I like to tout blogging as the new rapping whenever I can. Cause just like all the real bloggers out there, and real rappers, and Common in this verse,
Wales did not however vote for the current Tory lead government that is causing most of the current problems.
I closed the book to take another look at the cover, make sure I was reading the book I thought I was reading, and then went back to that last sentence. This is what I’ve been waiting for from the Orange Prize, I thought. In fact, it’s what I’m always waiting for in a novel—a tiny insight that makes you say yes, that’s exactly what it’s like.
I also quite strongly disagree with the idea that Mass Effect 3‘s position as being the last of a trilogy, and thus being in certain respect an ending in and of itself, somehow obviates the installment from conditions we might otherwise expect it to have. I’m afraid that is simply not the case, and the reason it is not the case is by its nature as an installment. While the underlying condition of a trilogy is indeed that each portion is part of an overarching narrative, they must also each have their own working parts; each unit must, in effect, duplicate the macrocosm on the microcosmic level. To put it in less fanciful terms – if one of the parts is busted the whole damn thing has problems.
...the sounds are buzzing louder as he finalizes this particular adjustment, then he...
A few hours after. All my fingers are extended in this photo, except the broken one.
Well, maybe not just as happy.
"Oh, oh... yeah. Gosh, I forgot..." I giggled at my silly question. Oops.
After checking around the cars and circling the campsite, I started down the road. Inside the forest, the eerie glow of early morning and the cool fog blanched the world a ghostly white. The moist nip in the air sharpened the scent of pine needles that littered the camp ground. I continued
Home Improvement Mistakes to Avoid
just so you know
2/3 cup granulated sugar
What we're missing here is what he does that makes people think he's losing his objectivity. If you're using that as the hinge for the plot, you need to be very very specific about what he does and why it's dangerous.
I´m a gay man with a gay lover and it´s the first time I´m at his place. He shows me the kitchen. The dining area -- he´s got a diiining aaarea! The living room. And then, when my mouth´s all dry: the bedroom. ”And here´s the hobby room,” he says as we enter and his bed is a homemade composition of aluminum pipes dressed in black leather. ”The stuff scenographers use on stage,” he says, ”it´ll carry anything.” And I love him even more when he shows me the swing he´s made from seatbelts. The guy´s a stellar handyman and he´s got this ability to never lose focus on what´s important in life. I spend the rest of my days naked in that swing between four aluminum posters, and do you know; that´s all it takes to make a man happy.
Of course if you want to take part in our other Challenges. Please visit our Challenge website. We still have lots of Squares needed for the Owl, Irish Rose, Jan Eaton, Music, Faces, Wiggles, Snowman, Nursery Rhyme Challenge. I'm sure there is something there that will interest you.
Now, it is nine years later. It will be interesting to see if "9/11" is still a date wedding couples avoid. My guess is that most wedding couples still prefer that their anniversary not coincide with a date associated with tragedy. I myself am nearly sold out for Saturdays in September and October 2010, but have had only one inquiry for September 11 so far.
Men and women don’t live very long;
So it is they (above said people) who are called by Allah (swt) “the maintainers of the mosques”-And in spite of all this, still the people who do Jihad are far superior in grade than them (maintainers of the mosques) before Allah (swt).
The importance of this trip is greater than the magnificent achievement of the actual crossing, it gives an insight into the ways that the first settlers of the islands may have thought; after all the problems of the voyage were the same regardless of the time period, nature in all her savage glory has no special concern for our personal advancement as a race, and will treat all humanity the same throughout the ages and the spaces of the world.
Obama has never said he wants a government-run health care system. He has said we have a moral duty to find ways to cover the nearly-50 million Americans who lack insurance and access to timely and inexpensive health care. He has said we pay too much (we spend $7,000 per capita for health care, way more than double any other nation — and we pay that for the 50 million people who don’t get health care, too). He has said we need to rein in health care cost inflation, which is double the rate of other goods and services, and which was a major factor in crippling American auto companies competing against foreign producers whose governments offer health coverage for all citizens including auto workers.
The facts of Church history are also examined in depth, with much corroboration from Protestant scholarly sources.
April 30 – May 08 — Early Voting for Entity Elections
● Use the Reverse Mortgage to purchase a new property
3. http://www.hwtm.com/ - Hostess with the Mostess is the perfect blog to follow if you love to entertain and throw parties, baby showers or whatever the event is. I’ve gotten so many great ideas from here.
Those of you who have been part of our community here for a few months will remember that this Cathedral is a new building. Our original building was something of an icon, having pushed the boundaries of building techniques in its time and won an award for SL architecture. Monty Merlin did a truly superb job in creating it. Though it was becoming a little dated in looks, the Cathedral still drew many to visit it, Christians and non-Christians. It was therefore with some trepidation that the attempt was made to create a new design. For many months Cady laboured and others commented, both the Leadership Team and as many of the community as were prepared to take a look. We even had a RL architect look it over!
Bing Crosby does a wonderful version of it in “The Bells of St. Mary.” As a kid I sang it in church. In Latin, which was never a problem, so why must it be in this day and age? My favorite part of the mass was always the singing (except for one memorable clunker of a hymn called “Long Live the Pope”).
Chaifetz gave the entire six-and-a-half-hour recording to the Cherry Hill School district (you can hear more of the clips here). One aide, Jodi Sgouros, was fired. Another aide and the teacher, whom theCollingswood Patch identifies as Kelly Altenburg, were reassigned but not fired.
Fans in St Louis look for a great promotion at NWA Dynamo Pro Wrestling on April 6th at NWA Dynamo Pro Wrestling as the NWA Worlds Heavyweight Champion Adam Pearce returns to meet Kahagas along with the homecoming of Santana G as she meets Christina Von Eerie. Fans will also enjoy the Dynamo Tag team tournament that night. If you listened to RingSyders Party Animal radio this past Sunday then you know what we will be giving away to the MWR fans at this must attend show in Glen Carbon, Illinois.
They have been known to trade their early draft picks or prospects for old, star players whose level of play has severely declined. Trades like Adam Mair and a second rounder that would turn into Mike Cammalleri to Los Angeles for Aki Berg and Brad Boyes, Alyn McCauley and a first round pick to San Jose for Owen Nolan, goaltending phenom Tuukka Rask to Boston for Andrew Raycroft and possibly the most infamous; two first round picks that would turn into Tyler Seguin, Dougie Hamilton, and a second rounder that would turn into Jared Knight to Boston for Phil Kessel. Mention of any of these trades make Leafs fans flinch, and for good reason.
And commissioned the merchant Casper van Senden to “take up” certain “blackamoores here in this realme and to transport them into Spaine and Portugall.”
Group actions
We live and we learn to take
Second, the punched circle overlaps the edges of the envelope. Again it will cause issues for the sorting machines, and may cost you more in postage because of the hand sorting that will be required.
(Sometimes I think I am too depressed to carry on a relationship. Too depressed to write him properly while he was gone, too depressed to try to start over like wanted, too depressed to try to impress him (like he suggested we do). My mom said that perhaps this depression is a blessing.)
The next startling moment for Puck and I was when we realized there was drinking everywhere and anywhere in the outdoor space. Yep buy your glass, your tokens and fill up before heading to the playground to watch the children. The glass pictured here, has a few sips out of it after Puck and I split the "taster in half". The glasses were being filled to the brim.
027.032 YUSUFALI: She said: "Ye chiefs! advise me in (this) my affair: no affair have I decided except in your presence."
Divinity carried her in its arms
This painting is for Vern Schwarz for The Flying Moleskins. Actually this painting is incorrectly titled, it should read: Henry, My Nemesis! I met Henry while painting plein air a while ago. He walked up to me wearing a blue on blue polka dot choker collar, he had a sleek short hair cut, and the wildest pompadour, complete with a topknot. His owners graciously allowed me to photograph him; Henry was obviously comfortable in front of the camera as every shot of him was perfect, all ready for a painting.
In the silence you can feel me,
Here are Ty and Markus going down the slide.
Ludwick is a founder of Oregonians for Immigration Reform, an organization which, according to their website, is dedicated to ending illegal immigration and securing the borders of the United States. At the Capitol, he hunts for the latest news on immigration bills and lobbies against any bill that violates federal immigration laws.
In the main room, there were a bunch of tables with water, nuts and three shots of whiskey for each seating. There a Scottish guy named Eden pitched the whiskey, telling us about its rich history in Scotland, and so forth. He sold Steven and me on taking a trip to Scotland, for sure, but I know we wouldn’t go just to visit whiskey refinery. He made a few quips about how expensive the whiskey is and how they donate much of the money to children’s charity.
As you slowly passed us by
Then of course there is historical evidence. Which I guess you will reject since it is not in scripture just like I did when I was first presented with this evidence. But I was hot on the trail of Pope Honorius and papal FALLIBILITY.
Then it's suddenly Tuesday and I haven't accomplished anything aside from making myself really sticky and totally disillusioned with love. At some point I'm like "I just have to do it. I'm going to sit down and write and see what comes out. No pressure."
If you have walked with the Lord for a while, you have your own stories. We have the privilege of reading about the Israelites, Abraham, Daniel, Ruth's and many others whenever we want. I encourage you to write a few of your faith walk stories down to share with others.
as inconsistent skies
Paper: Peach Parfait, Blush Blossom, Whisper White
Even though I don’t judge someone personally or cast judgement upon them, the Truth IS sharper than any sword and judges the thoughts and attitudes of the heart. God’s Truth IS the Truth, speaks nothing but the Truth, and judges on it’s own. I will always make sure that I am not being judgmental. But this has also taught me that God’s word will convict, because Truth and Spirit will act in ways that I have no control over. It’s control I personally don’t want anyway! Let that be God’s working in lives!
and beautiful dresses, silky and soft
A friend of mine from Church prays the Divine Office everyday at those times during the day when he can, since he works. As some might have guessed, one thing I lack in my life is discipline and I have a copy of The Little Office of the Blessed Virgin Mary. I don't know why but it keeps looking at me and making me feel guilty. It is there on a desk and it is not being prayed.
:: clear rectangular plastic container was a baby food container
Only they hadn’t.
Elisabeth Sladen - Sarah Jane Smith
I'm going to be writing to the state legislatures over the weekend. If I have to I'll write to the governor.
The evaluation turns out easier than i expected. Ted seems quite happy to just talk to himself and I am quite happy to let him.
My world would work if I could get a group willing to to play old school and tromp around in my world on a regular basis but all the people that I know in real life who play D&D for the most part play either 2nd Edition AD&D or 3.5 D&D and don't have any desire to play a game based before AD&D.
The early scenes of the film give the background for Esther’s desperate bid to make it in Hollywood , showing her in a suffocating small-town household, with a bullying aunt who ridicules her dreams of becoming an actress. This feels similar to the claustrophobic family setting in Small Town Girl. It is only too easy to see why she accepts some money from Granny (May Robson) and heads off to the bright lights. Eleven writers were involved in creating the A Star Is Born screenplay, including Dorothy Parker and Ben Hecht - whose wit adds to the sparkling dialogue. But, nevertheless, the film definitely has Wellman’s stamp on it, and this whole small-town sequence feels very characteristic of him.
As you have seen–the NFL video–almost every distinguished politicians, Presidents of U.S., Presidents of Universities, journalists, court lawyers, corporate lawyers have earned NFL points in high school.
As I played Geto Boys’ “Damn, It Feels Good To Be A Gangsta.” Four thirty-something dudes began came to the room where I DJed and began dancing. All four were white. For some reason, one kept throwing paper napkins on the floor.
Nxo
I don't know what they do on those nights we don't play, but nothing I've heard indicates nights of debauchery and skirt chasing. Instead, I hear about business deals and upcoming tournaments and occasionally the hurt comes out, "After 18 years, man...I don't know...I don't know if she was cheating, but she got so damn caught up on the FaceBook, that she never had time for me any more."
From a strictly drinks perspective, the Tiki Lounge can't compete with some of the internationally known big boys of tikidom or even some of the bars in town like Prescription or Curio who occasionally feature a tiki option on menu and have the range of rums and necessary ingredients to pull them off with aplomb. But for nightcrawlers seeking the whole tiki experience – deco and all - this is currently the only place in town to get it. It may be just baby steps, but it is a valid start to the tiki trend in Paris.
Your comments and requests are always welcome!
Not only is Noah’s Ark the largest zoo in the south west of England, but it also allows big zoo animals to roam within large territories in more than 100 acres of pristine countryside. Noah’s Ark is famous for South West attractions as there are lions, tigers, giraffes and rhinos, massive indoor play areas and also tractor rides and a petting zoo.
Why are we made to remember them above all else?
The international award recognizes one industry professional who has contributed to the betterment of the mold-making industry. Last year’s award winner hailed from China.
This figurative truth becomes clearly evident in watching the tides of mankind and the manner in which we hope for these tides or trends to fill the hole. There is always purpose to man’s comings and his goings; the ebb and the flow. We are always striving to improve our lot in life; to fill the void, avoid the ebb, and normalize the flow – increase our vocabulary, trade up the car, start a revolution, make a better impression, identify the inner-child, have whiter teeth, more colorful hair, better wages, more vacation, etc., ad infinitum. Our drive, or purpose, is certainly to fill an unseen hole; to make things better. The metanarrative of our life may even be, quite simply, that we try to fill the hole. It’s what we do. It’s the condition that we’re born with.
RoTP‘s narrator is an interesting paradox of experiences because he explores the ideas of loving-kindness and mindful presence while he himself becomes embroiled in his own emotions, anxieties, and obsessions, which, in turn, remove him from the experience. I just find it interesting that these minor themes come up and that fiction continues to be a great place to expand our understanding of ourselves and the world around us.
To argue that the Creation story privileges a heterosexual view of the relations between humankind is to make one of the weakest arguments possible: the argument from silence. An argument from silence is no argument at all. The Creation story is indeed about Adam and Eve, not Adam and Steve, as critics of homosexuality like to admonish. But though heterosexuality may be the dominant form of sexuality, it does not follow that it is the only form of appropriate sexuality.
we had the opportunity to venture onto another ridge of Jerusalem.
Q: Quality time-I love spending quality time with my friends and my family!
See the difference?
I know this, that and the other about the author’s other books and it left me unsure as to whether she would appeal to my tastes. Then again, the book is published by Mira and they also publish some of my favourite authors so I kept hope!
Levin said the developer plans affordable housing, though he wouldn't guarantee it would be included at that site. The firm would participate in the 80/20 program, gaining tax breaks for making 20% of the units are subsidized and thus affordable or buying certificates that ensure that affordable housing gets built elsewhere in the city. Skeptical audience members suggested that the latter tactic would be far more likely.
C: … so not in President Aquino’s vocabulary.
“For example, you must defend government policies, especially on ISA, explain to other diplomats Anwar Ibrahim’s ‘black eyes’, Mahathir Mohamad’s remarks on ‘shoot on sight’ rather than the word ‘shoo’ against the Vietnamese refugees, Bruno Mansur’s presence in Malaysia and on environment and so on.
*planting violas
…Is it me?
The study, funded by the National Science Foundation and published in the June issue of the Quaternary Geochronology, used high-precision argon isotope dating to make the new calculations. The radioactive decay rate from potassium 40 to argon 40 serves as a ‘rock clock’ for dating samples and has a precision of .2 percent. Darren Mark, co-author and a post-doctoral research fellow at the SUERC, recently helped fine tune the technique and improve it by 1.2 percent—a small-sounding difference that can become huge across geologic time.
I felt a warm calm waft over me.
Key people: Michael D. Rich
If you are one of my closest 136 friends, it means we must be Facebook buddies and you may have already heard about some of the new rules at the dinner table in my house. Yes, even though I mock rules and disregard them faster than lima beans, I have to have some structure when it comes to a six-year old and eight-year old boy.
He's none other than..
This result is a 600% increase on last year results and once again proving that we are the fastest growing polictical party in the UK.
– U.S. Prisoner Re-Entry Council Talks Grants, “Myth Busters”
Which of the following do you find most worrying?
James Sit down UK
So, if you have something that you are willing to donate,
My apology too, if I had done likewise.
In any case, as every author who wishes to get published knows (or will very soon learn), rejections go with the territory. But, it might be nice to learn that you're in good company:
Even before eating breakfast, I pulled on my boots and took my camera outside and took about a bazillion pictures. It was so unreal, so strange; I think I kept taking picture after picture in part because I couldn't quite believe what I was seeing...
The traditional Easter bunnies are not found in France. In a marked deviation from Easter festivities elsewhere, Easter celebrations in France incorporate the Easter symbols of bells and fish. The French Easter fish are called ‘Poisson d’Avril’, which means ‘April Fish’. The Poisson d’Avril makes his appearance on the 1st of April, as French children delight in playing a kind of ‘April Fool’s’ trick. They stick a paper fish onto the back of as many adults as possible.
This little Keroppi
"Do you want butter one them?" She asked every Saturday morning, even though the answer never changed. Michael grunted, and she put on the butter. Just as she always had, she walked them over to the table and set his down in front of him, and then walked with hers to her seat at the table. "Michael." His head snapped up from his plate to see her smiling there, "I know what you did to me." His stomach went empty, and he could feel the blood leave his face. She took a bite of pancake, chewed slowly, never losing her smile or eye contact, swallowed, and then finished her thought, "It wasn't very nice of you. All I wanted was a picture hung." His throat got dry, and her smile got bigger, "I promise I'll never ask you to do that again." Finally he was able to swallow, but could now see what he figured to be all of her teeth, "But I can promise one more thing, Buddy: I'm never leaving."
A wisp, a puff, a speck, a line;
Much as we both enjoyed The Deep but it wasn't quite as 'Wow!' as we were expecting and we both agreed that actually we prefer the Sea Life Centre in Scarborough and felt that it had more to offer. The Deep is still worth a visit, but if you had to choose one aquarium to visit, there would be no contest for us.
And a few other personal friends are also getting invisalign there! :D
The rest of the run looks like this: Bell's Double Cream Stout (yes, a firkin of that!) next week, Heavy Seas Below Decks Barley Wine the week after (1/27). If you were wondering how the distributor is going to make it up to us for delivering the wrong cask, then taking it back, I will tell you: A firkin of Bell's Hopslam. Yep. I will let you know when we plan on getting into that. It may go before the Below Decks, but I want to see it before I make any solid commitments to you folks. Expect a stampede of beer lovers when we tap the Hopslam.
I served this with a spinach side salad that complimented the flavors of the fish.
"Anne Eliza was surrounded by 'cultured' women, and she described her home as a 'literary center.' Her aunts contributed to magazines like Godey’s Ladies Book and The Ladies Repository. Poet and editor (The New World) Park Benjamin was a guest, as was writer and editor (The Home Journal ,which became Town & Country) N.P. Willis. Willis’s sister, Fanny Fern — novelist, essayist and children’s story writer — also visited often. Anne Eliza was acquainted with literary figures like Catherine Sedgwick, Washington Irving and William Cullen Bryant."Anne Eliza left Brooklyn soon after her own education was finished and eventually married and settled in Ohio.
It must be repealed. It must be obliterated.
“All the rage – the dernier cri: How can we joyfully subvert the latest hype? And what happens when the phrase is taken literally? Images of war and revolution emerge before the mind’s eye, but also the global emblems of the financial crises and the occupy movement. The ‘latest’ cry is also the final one, the end – which in turn gives rise to a new beginning. In the interstice between we look for: new positions and unexpected approaches.” (Andalus/Dada, Artistic directors)
1 pkg. (16.6 oz.) OREO Cookies, divided
Now remove the top of the shortcake and spoon about a half cup of the strawberries and juices onto the bottom of the cake. Top those berries with a big dollop of whipped cream. Place the top on the shortcake, and add another half cup of sliced strawberries, another smaller dollop of whipped cream and garnish the top each with a strawberry, and serve. Enjoy!
This changed the mood of the people watching the exchange, and they started to ask more questions. “Is there even any food to be had? Or is this just a scam?”
I think it is so adorable! I wish I would've painted the line a little longer so it disappeared off of the pillow but it isn't bothering my enough to do anything about it!
Yes a matter of weeks and yes I looked and people will look and read all this other personal stuff too, its human nature, its wrong but it happens.
The costume direction (by Jill Ohannesson) is just fine, sometimes boring, except for Nolan (see examples of his outfits here), who is the Hamptons version of Chuck Bass, extremely preppy and bold; and Ashley, played by Ashley Madekwe. Both are the most interesting characters of the series, in terms of fashion.
The Flip Ultra HD camcorder has been marketed as pocket-sized HD camcorder with easy to use interface. This article reviews some of the features of this HD camcorder.
The boycott’s best-known feature was the prohibition of direct trade between Israel and the Arab countries; but this in fact was the least harmful of its provisions. The blackballing of companies that merely dealt with companies doing business with Israel enlarged the circle of hatred to immense proportions (Pepsi, among others, participated in the boycott).
Before I get into this, have any of you seen GCB? It is hilarious! I just love Annie Potts anyway, and the rest of the cast is great, too. Kristen Chenoweth, especially. I've never seen David James Elliott in a role like this, and he does it so well. They play a married couple and spout Christian platitudes and quote Bible verses while having wild monkey sex all over the house. So so funny! I wasn't familiar with Leslie Bibb before this show, and don't know the others on there, but it's a good cast. Super rich Baptist Texan Republicans. What's not to like? LOL Hope you're watching it and like it, too. Lots of criticism from Christians about the hypocrisy in these comments HERE. (smirk) Sorry, but I know too many people like that around here to dismiss it. Besides, it's supposed to be funny and is.
Sonia Montano, University Unisinos, and Suzanne Kilpp, University Unisinos. The Methodology of Frames and the Audio-Visual Ecology
She also finished an adorable Maxima Ruffled Mitt. This is a perky little project, and there is still time to whip some up. We love the flared ruffles on the cuffs.
i don't want to forget christmas.
Tear bread loaf into bite sized pieces. Place bread in a greased baking dish, pour the custard over the bread. Push the bread to allow the custard to soak in.
Misfits & Heroes: West from Africa, by Kathleen Flanagan Rollins, takes place around 12,000 BC, and as you may have guessed, starts off in Africa. Naaba is an outcast from his village and a wanderer. It has been a long time since he's been part of a village, so when he comes upon one, he is drawn to it and watches a weaver at her work. While in this village, however, he finds Asha, a woman being held captive, and he frees her. She is drawn to water, and follows it even when it cannot be seen, and she decides to join Naaba in his wandering, so that she may follow the water without being punished.
Save their souls tonight and write their names in the book of life in Jesus name. When the fire falls tonight, let it bring them miracles in Jesus name. And I pray that they will never go back into to the world in Jesus name, thank you Almighty God, in Jesus mighty name we have prayed. Amen.
You don’t see cherry and gin flavours together very often, but this really did work well. The non-sugary cherry juice, combined with the zestiness of the lime, ensures that the drink has a pleasant crispness. It is the gin, however, that provides the accompanying clean finish. Simple, but delicious.
The fall came and I found myself wanting a pair of socks for myself. Picking a fun purple colorway I cast on and worked on the sock for months. (In my off time, which was increasingly disappearing.) I carried them with me to knit on the train or bus, to knit in between classes, and during my crafting group. I finally finished them a few weeks before Christmas. The were rather loose, which was disappointing to realize. I wore them none the less, in love with the fact that I made a sock. Unfortunately they were lost among some clothing items and were felted in the wash. During the sock challenge, I decided it was time I tackled cables. Having made a sock, and mittens, and a sweater, I wanted to tackle this. Using a basic cable pattern, I ended up making a green scarf that was soft, and beautiful and fun. I loved cables, I still do, I love the texture, the look, the act of knitting them. They keep knitting interesting, but are something I feel I could do while watching t.v.
I used a bit of brown paint to paint the INSIDE of the clear rubber tubing to create the impression that tea was flowing from the tea pot into the tea cup. I added a bit of clear glue on the inside of the tea pot and the "flowing tea" was secure.
I have had the October Afternoon Sasparilla range begging me to play with it for awhile so I leapt at this opportunity to use it. Here is my DT layout...
I'm knitting this in some Dale of Norway Svale, which I liberated from Mom's stash last year. There wasn't enough of it to make a sweater, so this seems like the perfect use. It's a DK (so warm and quick!) cotton/silk/viscose blend. It's one of the splitty-est yarns I've ever worked with. But, the silk makes it so soft and gives it beautiful drape, so I'm willing to forgive it.
That's where the fluorescent came in!
But just in the past twenty four hours.
My new one!!! If by any chance you haven't heard about this book, it's the first in a new series of four books about King Arthur's daughter Rhianna Pendragon and her friends Prince Elphin, Cai and Arianrhod. There are battles, knights, dragons, and a sword or two - though you won't find yourself sliding about in gore on every page. There's also a telepathic horse called Alba, a talking merlin, and quite a bit of magic.
Superior Digestibility
Yay Mimi and thank you so much.
She's really starting to look like a toddler too... her face has matured so much in these last several months and her hair has grown tremendously. She now has 12 teeth and her feet have FINALLY started growing (she's been in a size 0-3 month shoe for the longest time and now she's in a 3-6 month!) And for even more exciting news... she took her first steps last night! Granted she only took two steps and they were quite wobbly, but still, that's massive progress! What was she walking towards? Her ginormous panda bear, JoJo. She loves him. Hopefully there will be many more steps in her near future.
Let’s get things started by announcing the Top Mouse awards from the last sketch challenge.
chocolate, turquoise, caramel and vanilla...
8 oz. light sour cream
sleep calls me...or is it the end of the fun but trashy novel that sits on my bed. i shuffle off to bed on the cotton sheets in my pink slippers. today, life is good and the thunderbolts still echo in my head.
We appreciated your video a lot because it answered a purchasing decision question for us "visually"...and a picture is worth 1,000 words!!! We already knew we wanted to purchase a FURminator for our 2 large dogs (lab/retriever mix) based on the overwhelmingly positive reviews we had read, including yours, but we were still debating on whether or not to get the model with the FURejector. In your video it is clear how easily and effectively this feature "ejects" the fur from the brush - in fact we can even hear a distinct click sound when you press the release button and then see how all the bunched fur is free to drop in the trash. Looks worth it to us so we'll be ordering the exact model you used in your video (same size, too). Thanks for the help with our decision!
At the end of the broomstick’s arc is Kinzy’s bowl of eucalyptus. This bowl gets knocked off its pedestal and onto Kinzy’s table. Lunch is served!
austinkleon:
I want to always have beautiful feet and more than anything I could ever want for my kids is for their feet to be beautiful too.
Luckily, Cheapman is doing a special offer on bicycles at the moment!
So i am hoping that my handsome hubby is able to restore its life for me… All i have to say is thank god for him, because otherwise I would be a permanent iPad blogger.
Peace and Grace.
Get your tissues ready:
Until later.
Yesterday I wrote about how I was planning on making some changes in my classroom. Today I wanted to give a quick follow-up on how those changes were received.
The use of banker's check decreased after the introduction of the KRW 50,000 note in 2009, but until then, it was a common sight for the KRW 100,000 banker's check to get whipped out, usually with the same gusto that an American might pull out a $100 bill.
What does this all mean for broken windows, urban governance, and crime today? The problems of New York and the Bronx in particular in the 1980s were not radically different from those of St. Louis in the 1960s. The city was struggling, losing tax revenues, jobs, and population. Young people responded to an atmosphere of hopelessness by joining gangs, tagging walls, and inventing hip-hop. While Jeff Chang may lionize the gangs too much in his history, deemphasizing the real harm they did to themselves and their communities, they did represent one reaction to a crisis of drugs, violence, and general disorder that plagued the Bronx. That same frustration could also be channeled into art and music, as an outlet for creativity and as a kind of protest against authorities who seemed indifferent or even malignant.
Alas, if tonight was a glamorous night on the town with the love of my life, this is the outfit I'd be wearing. That beautiful bling would be a bonus outcome if it were to arrive on my left hand at the end of the night...
American Beauty director Sam Mendes has bought the rights to Canadian author Alan Bradley’s New York Times-bestselling Flavia de Luce mysteries.
AF: I love the creation and exploration of completely new worlds of my own imagining. Somebody once said that the art of creation is a sacred act, and there are times – when I’ve written the perfect sentence/paragraph/chapter – that I’d tend to agree.
The situation in the camp is devastating, and most women, young girls and children are walking around naked and barefooted. Some of the girls can’t even go to school because they don’t have clothes. The worst thing however, is pregnant women delivering their babies under trees in extreme weather with no shelter. This puts both the mother and child at risk. To make matters worse, children and newborns are severely affected by the shortage of food, resulting in high malnutrition rates.
With just a few statice, Limonium sinuata, blooms remaining the yarrow, Achillea millefolium, along with Coreopsis tinctoria, is blooming alongside the Berggarten sage. It has a more rounded leaf and low growing compact nature than the culinary sage.
This is pretty much what I've lived in the entire pregnancy. Old sports bras. Running pants. A decent pair of New Balance.
As readers of our blog, you might have guessed by now that we're big fans of the good old-fashioned craft values of advertising. It's also no secret that we're big fans of unashamedly putting a product centre stage loud and proud in any piece of creative work.
To improve the health situation in the country, it is established that there should be improvement in the training of healthcare providers; and there should be increased allocation for health to 15% of the total budget in line with WHO recommendations, while 10% is to be devoted to maternal and childcare. The media should also be used to advance the cause of maternal health programmes in Nigeria because ignorance is responsible for spreading diseases, and such enlightenment campaigns should not be limited to the issue of HIV/AIDS and cancer afflictions. It is also true that State Primary Health Development Agencies must be established in all local government areas of Nigeria; while functional health facilities with trained staff should be provided, as well as an integrated supervision system for healthcare centres. There should be improved referral system, to enhance good record keeping of statistics, and there should be improvement of girl-child education while there should be free Medicare for children, pregnant women and the aged. In the words of Saleh Mohammed again, “There should be attention paid to International Donor Partners (IDP) programmes and signing of MOU with foreign medical experts to provide HITECH Medical Services in the states of the federation”, he concluded.
Pan Seared Orange Cod: serves 2
The boy was never criminally charged, but the Dr. Michael M. Krop Senior High School has a zero-tolerance policy when it comes to drug related incidents so he was suspended for an undisclosed amount of time.
The picture on the bottom is the entrance road to the psychiatric prison hospital in Strindheim across the road from my house. Still winter here!
It went really well today. I just spent most of my time getting to know the group and getting them a little focused where drama is concerned. We spent most of the time building the 3 C's that I like to use when working with children and performance (This was a skill gained when working with the TIE company "Urban Voice)
May 2011 - Mother's Day
Coach your child to persistent and say again, "Having this happen is making me feel bad about going to school. Please, I really need you to listen."
Janice MacLeod
Sorry for all the complaining in regards to it, but thanks for bearing with me.
On a sidenote, she's a napper... and I was very concerned about her starting full days since she's not used to going without a nap. Needless to say, we've been blessed by an easy transition of she and I napping together when she gets home from school. After a wonderful one-on-one day with LD, it's really great to spend some cuddle time with Madisyn!
Creme didn’t understand why everyone was so angry, or why they were now dodging stampedes of people and flying rocks. Today was supposed to be a happy day, the day they went to the city because of daddy.
My beautiful mom is 83 years young tomorrow so I made this for her. We are off to celebrate with a breakfast first thing in the morning.
You are to search throughout Bree-town for envelopes while the envelopes could be nearly anywhere on ledges etc.
Another employee at Kona Grill confirmed Wednesday that Ryan Perrilloux was involved in a verbal altercation at the restaurant, saying the junior quarterback called a server “Osama.”
The SCOTUS Blog indicates that Stevens "almost certainly has Bilski, which suggests a narrow approach to permitting business method patents but probably not a extremely detailed test."
And the other I wrote:
These people don’t think like normal humans. I guess it was Herbert Hoover – no, J. Edgar Hoover – who said, when a conspiracy is so big, people’s mind boggles and they go into denial.
Sixteen year old me was greatly disappointed last night.
We look out the window to what is ahead of us
Step 7: Apply first coat of poly.
Hi my friends!! I hope you've had a fabulous first weekend in May! We are enjoying some great sunshine here! To start this week, I wanted to share with you this card I created with My Mind's Eye Mrs. Caroline papers and Spellbinders die templates (S5-033 Bird Sanctuary, S5-071 Twisted Metal Tags and Accents.) The sentiment comes from a MFT Birthday set. I made the card for Memories and More where I am working now. They carry such an enormous amount of Spellbinders Dies and just about everything else you could imagine too! I love working there and have loved the chance to meet so many people. The class I taught on Saturday went well and I will post photos about NSD soon!
The Story of the Orchestra! We began with Vivaldi this week, read a short bio and listened to a portion of Spring (from the Four Seasons) on the accompanying CD.
olives (we used beautiful purple Alphonso olives from Chile)
-Those pieces were more likely to have our beautiful china pattern on them
Subtle decorations can add a fun element.
"Well, I invited her over to my place,
A Prophet (France)
Stuff that erodes and outright takes away our liberties, pursuit of happiness (property), and yes, even life.
Mee Suah (Flour Vermicelli) is our family favourite noodle.
Taylor Swift’s song is the more passive example, with a more cheerful tune and relatively innocent lyrics. But the spiteful message is still there, and that’s Swift saying: “I’ve got six Grammy Awards, and you’re still just an angry moron in a small town.”
How about that last week, both of my staplers with my name labeled on them were taken.
. . . A claim of dilution applies only to purely commercial speech. Mattel, 353 F.3d at 812. See also Bolger, 463 U.S. at 66-67 (finding that materials do not become “commercial speech” simply because the author had economic motivation to create them). “The question whether an economic motive existed is more than a question whether there was an economic incentive for the speaker to make the speech; the Bolger test also requires that the speaker acted substantially out of economic motivation.” Procter & Gamble Co. v. Amway Corp., 242 F.3d 539, 552-53 (5th Cir. 2001) (emphasis supplied). “Thus, for example, speech that is principally based on religious or political convictions, but which may also benefit the speaker economically, would fall short of the requirement that the speech was economically motivated” and therefore would be considered noncommercial. Id.
2. Use your hands to mix it all up. (My mom was upset that I didn't have those clear disposable kitchen gloves as she is the type of person to wear gloves while driving or hiking.)
I left it over night and the next morning I applied water to my hair using my spray bottle and applied the Ucuuba & Shea Butter Lux Locs Styling & Shine product. I hoped that this would give me the definition I was looking for, but surprisingly it didn’t.
Pretenders I go to sleep UK
When I entered the crypts below Tristram cathedral for the first time many moons ago, all I knew was that I would at some point confront an analogue of Satan and would be required to cease his existence through mortal combat.
Yep. That’s the real issue. Looks like the media (as represented by Blitzer and buddies) are spending a lot of time pushing the Republican agenda.
And just because I like the photo, see below a snap I took the other night from my other favourite Parisian bridge, the Pont Alexandre III. You've got to hand it to the old dame Paris, she sure does scrub up well.
In Part I of Demeter’s Love, I introduced a number of elements to the reader. They are threads which will be picked up, worked into a fabric and woven together again. That, in and of itself, is a reversal of the singular masculine, left-brain activity of constructing a linear narrative and sticking to it. We all know our high school education, which stressed and trained us in the superiority of, and adherence to, the expository essay. The linear drill goes like this: first, make your statement, then provide all supporting evidence to prove that statement, then make one’s concluding statements. All wrapped up in a neat package. That is, indeed, a true reflection of the left brain view of the world. It works, however, for only one half of the brain. Unfortunately, the creative yin does not obey those rules of verbal and written expression. This is exactly why her part of the symbology is depicted as black – it is difficult to perceive her hidden wisdoms and it requires the cultivation of our impressionistic visionary abilities to follow her.
1) Each player gets: 10 Statement Cards, 5 True/False Cards and, 2 Negation Chips. You will be choosing cards to play on each turn, so it’s ok to look at all the cards in your hand. (You could deal out more or less cards if you want the game to take more or less time. This number was manageable for about a ten-minute game. Most groups were able to play two games.)
The full team met at Northwood Station, two of us waiting in the cosy waiting room for the third, and made our way to Mount Vernon Hospital, to begin our journey to Ealing Hospital. There seems to have been some new building since I spent some time visiting the burns unit in 1987, but we did not linger to explore, as a 282 was ready to go. It was a double decker, somewhat to our surprise and delight.
My issues, yes are mine, but buddy, don't think you don't have them too. I hope someday you are able to work them out. Maybe then, you and I can have an actual relatonship. I can't say I'm happy about this. I've been crying now, more than I've cried in a long time.
Paperbag to hold tag from Kraft Outlet
outside of Auckland, New Zealand and it has been going strong ever since.
2. No Love Lost
Unfortunately, sometime shortly after this last picture my foot slid on a wet rock and I fell down - right on top of the camera that was in my pocket... The camera is now kaput, but luckily I wasn't hurt.
thing is, when i get home from work i rarely turn on my pc anymore, because i’m already staring at the silly computer at work all day long, and i feel like my kitties appreciate my undivided attention and cuddles :)
And you not mad at exploitation of femininity, but you mad that I cover
Discovery and Pre-Clinical Stage Products 15
Buff: What qualifications do you possess? Do you think you'll make a good Vice President?
What I like about Kite Strings is that it deals with many social issues at one go. There is the ever existing phenomenon of self-identity, self-respect for a woman which tends to get obliterated in the ever rampant putting down of the female gender in society.
"I will decide who deserves punishment," he warned her.
The first race saw favourite Star in Flight romp home under Jason Maguire – winning by a margin which showed the 4 year old is set for good things in the future. There is no doubt that the ground – good to soft, although more soft looking, showed those horses who had stamina and fitness to cope with the conditions. Margins of 8 lengths, with the third horses over 20 lengths behind that on three occasions either flattered the winners or showed poor preparation of the others. In fairness, there were a number of maidens and novices on show in what was a fairly competitive card.
I decided to go with roast. Jamie Oliver's book Jamie's Italy had a method for roasting quails. Granted he suggested covering them with pancetta, which I didn't do, and it probably would have moistened the meat a bit more. I did rest them on a bed of fresh herbs as Jamie suggested though. I went out on my balcony to pick the thyme and rosemary. It was a horrific, rainy, chilly night and the 30 seconds I spent out there cutting herbs was torture. The things I do to feed my family!
Okay -- so there's not time or room enough to highlight everyone in one post. I have learned something though. Everyone is a character. We just need to look and listen and and pay attention to them. What makes them interesting? What is it about this person that makes me want to smile when I am around them? Why does the hair on my arms stand up when I stand next to that person? How can I create characters in my stories that create these kinds of emotions for my readers? What do you do? Do you base your characters on people you know?
*Bar-B-Chew toys
See-Saw Solution
slices;
Je cuisine
Discoverer, Scientist, Author and Consultant.
Virtues: What do you like most about yourself or your writing that you think you can say without sounding too conceited? What makes you so flippin' amazing? (You know this is what people mean when they ask 'what are your strengths', don't look so shocked.)
"I will never forget you," the old man said. A tear rolled down his leathery cheek. "I'm getting old. I can't take care of you anymore."
Therapist.
I am super excited to mention...and you darn right i'm mentioning it because i'm proud of myself..that i have lost 8 pounds. Now, you can't really tell from looking at me but I have. I have been doing weight watchers and sticking to it and when I weighed myself on Sunday i was down 3 more pounds which makes 8 in the last three weeks. Yahooooo! I'm super pumped..now, if i could just get back on some sort of running schedule.
I myself have recently tried to be bold and added a section of purple to my up-do. I love it and everyone is telling me to go whole head. Sadly, I’m not that brave to bleach my hair completely seeing as I am a natural brunette. Maybe I’ll consider it, but for now I love my purple hair.
Here is how Wynn arrived (pictured with "Rayne"):
Colouring Medium ... Copics, Spika Pen & Sakura Jelly Roll Pens
When the custard and tart crust have cooled, spoon the cream into the crust and spread evenly with a spatula. Arrange slices of strawberries, kiwi, apricots, and whole berries on top of the cream in circles, starting along the outer edge. When assembling is complete, brush the fruit gently with melted fruit jelly. (Place 1/4 cup in the microwave in a small glass bowl, then brush on with a pastry brush. If all you’ve got is jam, melt it and strain it.)
2. Melancholy Man
Wayne Messmer greeted my friend and me with a song when we met during a business lunch. He approached the table at Wildfire in Schaumburg and sang, “When the moon meets the sky like a big apple pie that’s…” He pretended to hold a microphone and encouraged me to sing in response and so I did: “Amore.” I would like to publicly extend an apology for those diners who had to endure my off pitch musical response.
All in all, Spire Publishing is clear and concise about their services. The Print Ready Plus package seems to offer the best deal provided the author can supply their own files. The author would be best served having their own website to drive sales of their books as this is a significant area not provided for. At the time of this review, their ‘Promote Your Book’ marketing link was not working, and that in itself is not a strong sign.
Enjoy meals like
To make it work, the parent company sets up a third subsidiary (S3) in the Netherlands, with no other purpose than to funnel money from S2 to S1. Instead of licensing the parent’s products directly to S2, the Bermuda-based S1 grants them to its Dutch partner, who then passes them along. In other words, S1 and S2 are the bread around an S3 Dutch meat sandwich. What good is that? The Irish don’t tax money being moved among European countries (S2 to S3), and the Netherlands takes only a small fee for moving the money from S3 to S1. This makes it so the “royalties” checks can arrive in Bermuda virtually untaxed.
“Why, stupid?”
When the sardine
The more mature we are when we enter a relationship, the more likely we are to succeed in finding the harmony we desire. In general, we attract persons who correspond to our present stage of interests, motives, values, goals, etc. This occurs through the attraction of similar or opposites. As we ourselves mature and become more aligned to our true selves, we will attract people who are aligned to our true selves.
Targeted strikes are wise. Remotely piloted aircraft in particular can be a wise choice because of geography, with their ability to fly hundreds of miles over the most treacherous terrain, strike their targets with astonishing precision, and then return to base. They can be a wise choice because of time, when windows of opportunity can close quickly and there may be just minutes to act.
-Because I have believed, I have the seal of the Holy Spirit.
Have you noticed I've been on a Lovely As a Tree kick lately? Can't help it....I think it's about the most versatile stamp set I've ever used!
619 - Dennis Lamp
Mix all these ingredients together and serve with chips or vegetables like cucumber, carrot and celery.
Where children want to play
cataclysm is a tale of Satan to pacify the Flock from their DUTY to bring the
Here is how I colored him for my final picture. Since I didn't want to switch paper, I changed my technique instead. I decided to go with feather blending. I am working with the Natural Blending Group of R24, R29 and R59. Since R29 is the darkest in the R20's group, then I can shadow it with either R39 or even darker, R59. Since I like more contrast, I went with R59.
But this week, thanks to this lady, I have found my self back in the kitchen, cooking new, inspiring and delicious recipes, that not only I have loved but my little ones have too.
From the ramp, from backstage, walks out the new champion, belt around his waist, suit on his body, fedora tilted slightly on his head. On his left arm a British beauty. On his right a Virginia beauty, one who claims to be from the more country aspects of the commonwealth. They’re both dressed in the same vein as the announcer, but their tops are showing that very cleavage as in the video. All he’s missing is a pimp cane.
Crawford is the most similar to Matt Kemp out of all of the Dodgers who wore No. 27.
2. Once you get out of the subway, if you're feeling really lost, you can always stop at a near by Starbucks. It's always available for directions, water and ridiculously overpriced organic chocolate milk for the kids. But it's worth every dime.
Yesterday was my friend Patrice's birthday, we already went out for a meal last weekend but I wanted to give her a wee gift too. This month our budget has to be super tight if we're gonna stay on track with our savings because in Feb the car insurance, 2 new tyres and a few other one-off bills all came out at once, don't you hate that? At least they're done for the year now.
Mason said his distinct Jewish sense of humour often alienated members of that community. He said: ‘A lot of Jews are embarrassed by Jewishness because it reminds them of their parents and grandparents who were refugees and poverty stricken. They were always like an alienated minority. People who are raised that way still have a feeling of “I don’t belong if I’m Jewish so I’d rather you don’t mention it”.’
All who teach me something along the way
I also want to thank Swifty for giving me the opportunity to represent and serve for Uncle Billy's Brew & Que. I had a blast!
A Scouser is an individual from Liverpool. Scousers are notoriously maligned and stereotyped by everyone else in the UK. This is because they are jealous. Our immigrant population ensures that there is an excellent gene-pool, thus avoiding the horrific inbreeding seen in the majority of incest-rife no-mark cities of the UK. Scousers hate the English – because we are not English we are Scouse. As a scouser I can trace my lineage back to the Kings of Ireland. Mancs (for example) can only trace their lineage back 20 years to when their dads arse-raped a sheep, hence the wool on their greasy backs.
The really nice thing about this surgery is that we aren’t far away from support (i.e. the middle of the Pacific Ocean). We are just up in Milwaukee, so we have plenty of friends and family who have made plans to be there for us in whatever capacity we need. I am so appreciative. I feel bad because I have no idea what to tell people when they ask, “how can I help?” because I don’t know what our days in the hospital are going to look like yet, but the simple fact that they have made themselves available to us is an immense comfort. So, thank you, everyone. Sincerely. Mahalo nui loa.
“THE CURSE OF FENRIC” – Season 26, Serial 3, Story 155 – The Seventh Doctor and Ace head back to World War II and do a slow burn to brilliance. The TARDIS sets down in a northern English coastal village where the Brits are codebreaking German messages with the ULTIMA machine. There’s evil in the air and evil in the water as an ancient Viking curse comes to the surface. There’s British soldiers and Russian soldiers and Haemovores all killing each other. There’s Fenric and the Ancient One, plotting and swerving. There’s the Doctor reducing his Companion to tears. And there’s Ace, little girl lost and manipulated and coming into her own, physically and figuratively caught between her past and her future as she becomes one of the most important Companions in the program’s history. This is classic Who’s penultimate serial and instead of the series crumbling away it’s building a blueprint for the future. Because The Curse of Fenric Is The First Serial of the 2005 Revival. Believe It.
Those who practise Maharishi’s Transcendental Meditation experience these qualities of consciousness in their own Transcendental Consciousness.
Red Rooster is sited at 310 Lenox Avenue – that is, at 310 Malcolm X Boulevard – between 125th and 126th Street.
I miss my special friends Laura and Judy on Whidbey Island who went through the great tragedy with me and were the only two people who stood by my side. And yes, a lot of you were with me too...
OK, maybe I will come back one day. But right now I am all about the Outback. The real life. Where men are hairy and made of leather.
The Zimmerman-Martin case revealed how sharply divided whites and blacks in America still are since the signing of the Civil Rights Act of 1964. While strides have been made in the nearly fifty years since then to ensure equality before the law, a relative minority of the black community, some 13% of the U.S. population, has demonstrated progress. By almost any measurement of social disfunction African Americans lead all other races in America.
Are you missing all of the joys that life has to offer because your mind is elsewhere and you don’t take time to notice? What would you have seen in this story?
Hiya Folks
My blog has always been just a place to write. I'm very fortunate in that I have a great day job and that blogging can be purely a hobby. I have no need or desire to make money out of it. But we bloggers are apparently "new media". We are influential in our little spheres. I have personally checked out products recommended by other bloggers, even purchased things, so I can see how this is changing the marketing world. Last week I got my first invitation to a press event. It was for a local children's clothing company, one which happened to have been started right in my own neighborhood, and one that I already know and love.
I’m always a little concerned about earthquakes, and even lorries driving along my street, as I live in an old building, with huge and old cracks throughout, and very little mortar between the bricks, but I was assured that this was all old earthquake damage and subsidence and specialists had confirmed that the house was now stood on bedrock and wouldn’t move more. But still, I’m always cautious! In fact, I’m actually more worried about the combination of thunder, heavy rain, and earthquake at the moment, as its been very hot, and we have had lots of sudden downpours, which lead to temporary flooding. I checked the house and the cracks in the building and nothing seems to have moved, but I have developed a leek in the kitchen roof. There are lots of signs of leaks in the past, and roofs are generally just tin slates and not always great quality, many are old and have only been patched up. I’ve been surprised not to have experienced more leaks, so this is the first and is in the position of an older one. Its not bad, just a few big drips and I hope that once this few weeks of storms passes, life will get back to usual.
According to the PAA2011, police permits are no longer necessary to hold an assembly but organisers must submit a notification to the district police at least 10 days before the event is held.
The years that through my portals come and go.
I've chosen one of my surprisingly enigmatic drawings for you all. This was a simple drawing I did of an adorable little donkey at my local Zoo, which surprisingly draws in people more than any other drawing I've done. I cannot figure out why, but people just love this little guy. The title, "Nobility Hath no Shape" came about because I always have had a soft spot for donkeys, even if they are not considered as sleek as horses.
Both you put together using your lyrical whit.
And stoop and build ‘em up with hearts and minds
I saw her face change from “easy-breezy check-up” to “let’s investigate this issue”. She expertly prodded my massive pregnant belly with her hands and then popped the baby up on the ultrasound machine to be sure. Breach baby. Thirty-seven weeks.
Greetings from my Blackberry. Phone line fault has rendered my home an internet-free zone, which is a right neck-in-pain in my line of work. You realise how horribly dependent we've all become on the wretched thing. Hope we can get it sorted soon, after which normal service will be resumed.
“Does drawing something potentially obscene count?”
There's something about this time of year that makes me want to watch more film-noir. It's strange because when it comes to noir, I'm a pretty light-weight viewer, but I've already seen two in the last week and I'm craving more. There's just something about the moody photography and sharp dialogue that fits so perfectly with a cold winter night and a mug of hot chocolate.
体现于完美的组合
But as for me, I trust in Thee, O LORD, I say, “Thou art my God.” My times are in Thy hand. Deliver me from the hand of my enemies, and from those who persecute me. Make Thy face to shine upon Thy servant. Save me in Thy lovingkindness.
We are sponsored for this challenge by our regular sponsor Simon Says Stamp with a $10 voucher code for the winner
Each week, as I type up my post, I eat cake and drink tea and ponder. Idyllic, no? And why, yes, I am a very skilled multi-tasker - thanks for noticing. Sometimes it takes me one slice, sometimes two. Today I am on my second Chocolate Streusel cupcake and still only on the first paragraph. Does this mean that this cake is unbelievable? Hmm, I'm not sure about that. What I am sure about is the following.
Whisk flour, baking powder and salt in medium bowl. Set aside.
Shallot Butter (Cooking Light pg.
~~~End Wiki Research~~~
“When my daughters turn eight, they’ll get their first Swiss Army knives, and not the tiny ones with a nail file and some scissors, but real ones, big enough to gut a fish with.
When Janie first asked me if I wanted to write a contribution to this topic it left me rather stumped.
U-S-A!
Intentional Self-harm (suicide)
Through cookin' and the plates for two
We have rewards points with our banking..and very few rewards points..takes me a long time to accumulate points..Last year we received the Breville Juicer that I love..the year before a Panini press I think.. this year..I opted for the Breville Mini Pie Baker.
For his pop thirst.
A year ago, I dipped my toe in the e-book waters by publishing a quirky hitman thriller called FIREPOWER. It was well-received, and the process taught me how to load books to Kindle and Smashwords. Soon, I secured the rights to my backlist and re-published all my earlier work as e-books.
I grinned as I ran to check out my new bedroom, with the dogs at my feet. I hugged my Doberman in my excitement and she licked my face, making me giggle. No more cramped camper on a beach for us.
training, both in hard military
my smile? well, you just gotta, don't you?
Lola Ridge – The Ghetto
Susan Lambert, president of the British Columbia Federation of Teachers, said organized labor is "building a movement that is global in scope."
Things are very busy down at Crafty Angels with all the planning for the birthday bash which is coming up very soon!! If you haven't read all about it you can do so HERE.
To sum up, make it active, incorporate collaborative learning, problem-based learning, formative assessment and reflection, possibly even "look ahead homework" instead of just readings and guess what? Students learn more!
Abstract: Although Indigenous people in the poorest developing countries of the world confront the most severe hardships, nevertheless even in the most developed countries such as Australia, Indigenous standards of living in terms of economic, educational and basic human standards are far inferior to other groups within society. It has been argued that Indigenous affairs in Australia is divided into ‘‘two ideological tribes’’ both vigorously opposed with respect to the preferred manner in which the substantial disadvantage of Indigenous Australians can be overcome. Although more complex categorisations of ideological positions are possible, both maintain considerable influence within the field of Indigenous policy formulation in Australia and in the Northern Territory in particular, where nearly 30 per cent of the total population is Indigenous. The main purpose of this paper is to examine the central arguments advanced by these two sides of the debate and the implications for public policy decision making and Indigenous people, within the context of the Northern Territory of Australia.
Girl quits her amazing job to move back to KY with Huge Asshat.
"The potential for tobacco control legislation to have a positive effect on health is becoming increasingly clear."
What you are is He
I made the curls by taking jewelry wire and wrapping it around a pencil. Then I used my Versamark pen to get them good and wet. I dipped them in the Blueberry and then heated them up. I actually did this twice just to make sure I got it nice and thick so it would really show up.
“So he opened his eyes then died?”
Please don't forget my Benji...
*Add more powdered sugar, if needed. The icing should not be too thin, but it should fall reading from a spoon or be a pouring consistency.
1. Give up your need to always be right. There are so many of us who can’t stand the idea of being wrong – wanting to always be right – even at the risk of ending great relationships or causing a great deal of stress and pain, for us and for others. It’s just not worth it. Whenever you feel the ‘urgent’ need to jump into a fight over who is right and who is wrong, ask yourself this question: “Would I rather be right, or would I rather be kind?” Wayne Dyer. What difference will that make? Is your ego really that big?
live in colour
But unschooling parents encourage our kids all the time, so I wouldn't group that with push/expect.
There is a bus stop here between the track to Sungei Api Api and Pasir Ris Park. If I remember correctly, the bus number is 403. Along the beach, there are toilets and venting machine for soft drinks. Cost about $1.10. Bring along your coins.
Springtime brings with it all kinds of wild and wacky weather. So our challenge is for you to create a papercraft project that reflects the weather somehow. It could be through your image, diecuts, designer paper, embellies, whatever floats your little boat! But we want to see something about the weather when we look at your project.
Do homebrewers have any such titles or rankings? Not at all. Aside from being no more than a pastime, homebrewing is a much more egalitarian activity. Even award-winning, long-time homebrewers still make mistakes and are still learning about their devoted weekend diversion. There is much more camaraderie and less status among homebrewers, as the hobby lends itself to teaching and learning across both the novice and the expert.
You taught me so many lessons in life, without even realizing you were teaching. You taught me that it doesn't matter how rich your bank account is, what's important is how rich your life is. You worked your entire life for very little. While you may not have had a million dollars in the bank, when it came to life and love, you were a millionaire 10 times over. You taught me that pride isn't about what you own, but where you come from.
this month we will be using Country Garden from Bo Bunny.
Place the butter and bittersweet chocolate in a microwave safe bowl and heat in 30-second bursts at 50% power, stirring in between, until completely melted and smooth. Add the sugar, eggs, and vanilla to the bowl and whisk vigorously until the mixture is thick and glossy. Stir in the flour and salt with a rubber spatula, mixing just until combined.
You have may have noticed that I’ve been mentioning Eric Roberts a lot so far. I’m honour bound to do this as penance to my BFF Kev for not being suitably impressed that Eric Roberts was in Sharktopus in the first place. It nearly caused a fight, well, not fight exactly, more an idle bicker. Sorry, Kev, and sorry, Mr. Roberts.
Karina Cantu, Attorney at Karina Cantu Law, PLCC
Take care, hope to hear from you soon.
These two cards were made for very good friends of mine, Jean and Heather. My inspiration for these cards came from a fabulous lady called Linda and a card she made here. I admire her work and as much as I would love to be able to do the same sort of work, I'll have to resign myself to wanting to be like her when I grow up!!!
Have to get my supper made quickly and then Shawn has a doctor appointment this evening so I need to get going!
right corner of the form.
Criminals run this city from the inside (oh yeah)
And the eye could see pretty far with the lodgepole desert no longer blocking the view. Spring came, and with it new grass, new trees, new vistas — and most of all, vastly expanded habitat for the animals. Grizzlies, black bears, wolves, mountain sheep and goats, coyotes, sandhill cranes, eagles, ospreys, and of course buffalo, elk, and deer.
If ‘Chennai Live’ succeeds before the Copyright Board, it will clear the way for other English music radio stations to mount similar challenges against PPL. Since most English music is owned by American companies, it is likely that English music radio stations in India will not have to pay a dime for most of the music that they broadcast.
Nov 17 Cincinnati, OH — Taft Theatre
The peditrician and I heard a baby crying. The baby was outside with her mother waiting for their turn to past. However, the baby was not crying out of exhaustion, she was crying because she was hungry. The mother refused to breastfeed her child because she did not want her breast to drop, supposedly she wanted her breast to stay fresh and perky. Hmm…she needs to understand that your breast are not longer yours once you have a child.
Back to my question. Why do I say that I don't think I'll see a bankruptcy filing soon? By the way, this is not a statement of fact. Simply a supposition on my part.
Storyline: As a police psychologist works to talk down an ex-con who is threatening to jump from a Manhattan hotel rooftop, the biggest diamond heist ever committed is in motion…
In large skillet over medium-high heat add the oil and then brown the ground beef, about 5-6 minutes. Add the onion and green pepper and cook another 3-4 minutes, until the vegetables start to get tender. Stir in the steak sauce and beef stock, season with salt and pepper, bring up to a bubble and cook about 2 minutes.
“The world of CBD is very well alive. By the way, CBD does not stand for central business district. CBD stands for the world of ‘Can Be Done’,” Mr Lim said.
To only see you!!!
Essay written by Scott Anderson, Assistant Director of Dining Services at Shepherd University
“I’ll most certainly read the leaflet,” Olivia said enthusiastically. “In fact, my sister called to remind me about the prayer shawl she’d sent sometime back. She insisted that I cover myself with it. The prayer blanket ministry she belongs to made it, so I’m going to use that, too.”
peace , love and pistachios.
I just need to give it time.
How true. How poignant. (Isn't poignant such a strange word?)
“And it looks a lot like Diesel…Miss Dora’s dog,” murmured Carol, picturing the black and very fuzzy male terrier mix.
Différance is a term of non-local retro-causality
We are peace…..if we want it.
An agent taking a chance on me would REALLY help me focus!
The story is fairly simple if you take it at face value. Three boys mysteriously get special powers and start to control and grow them. The fun ends when one of the boys starts to go rogue, which leads to a climax that pits the friends against each other. It’s only when the movie begins that you forget about what you know about the movie from the previews and become immersed in a sad tale of a boy trapped in a desolate and hopeless world. The movie revolves around Andrew (brilliantly played by Dane DeHaan) who has the camera in which most of the film is filmed with. Andrew is a likable guy with some major family problems but he doesn’t let that hurt his disposition as he buys a camera and decides to “chronicle” his life. He doesn’t have many friends and is sort of a loner. It isn’t until him and two others (Matt and Steve) stumble upon a mysterious hole and are given powers that he starts to enjoy the life he films. The first 45 minutes or so are sort of a whimsical experience as the boys challenge their limits and become acquainted with their new powers. The first half of the movie is fun not because of the powers on display but because of the people who display them. Dane DeHaan, Alex Russell, and Michael B. Jordan are excellent young talents and with lesser actors, Chronicle would have probably been a one trick pony.
Draw a line 15" along the top
Please allow me to introduce myself. I am a transplant. I was plucked roots and all from fertile ground in a land of brilliant sunshine and nourishing rain and deposited in frozen tundra, a vast wasteland of crumbling buildings and uncaring souls. For years I withered and railed against the harshness of the terrain. I longed for the warmth of my homeland. I longed for beauty and kindness.
Last up this week is Kimberly Crawford. Kimberly is using the Autumn Flourishes set. For the stamp mist technique challenge, Kim chose to create die cut leaf accents which actually become the focal image in the arrangement. The technique is done the same...ink, mist, stamp, but afterwards, Kim cut out the shapes, added some sponge coloring and color misting, then darkened the edges for an added effect. Love the colors, the design elements, and details!!! Wonderfully done, Kim!
A Traveller in Italy by H V Morton, not actually found in the library but given to me recently by my old college professor - a happy coincidence given that we are planning our own travels in Italy - is a such a pleasure to read. I cannot say travel writing is a genre that has heretofore particularly interested me but I can see me reaching for more of Morton's books, especially those about Rome. The Fountains of Rome was a darn good read if a little too heavy (physically) for bedtime reading.
Here are this week's HOT or COLD sample cards for your inspiration from the new 7 Kids College Fund Design Team. Please extend a warm welcome our newest members.
The Emancipation Of Mimi generated three Grammy awards (including Best Contemporary R&B Album), two #1 singles, and countless more honors during its 18-month chart stay.
of waking up to that expression every morning. ;-)
"SA THEN versus NOW"
I will consult with God and know that I will be guided to do what is needed.
10 oz frozen chopped spinach, thawed and completely drained
I’ve dabbled in the online dating previously, but never really got “into it”. No, I’m not in fake love with anyone…but I’m in love with the process this go around. Many people have suggested I try it…you know EVERYONE has a story, a girl I work with; well her cousin met a guy online and they married in 3 months and they are SO in love. You ALL have a story.
No matter what he does in any film, Lee always knows how to make everything pretty. He uses a lot of different lenses that add this dirty and gritty feel but he’s also able to change it up at any moment and place us in a different time and place. Once again, Lee is just playing around with his certain camera tricks and is seeing what he can and can not do, but it still works all of the same and makes Lee the wonder he is usually known as. Well, that is when it comes to his art-direction.
stunning beauty!
READER QUESTIONS
I have also gotten two new dog training calls this week. Both of which have resulted in Behavior Evaluation appointments. Why, yes, I did write them down. Thank you for asking. I have emails out with forms and paperwork and appointment times all set up. One is in my home town and one is in Silverdale.
To provide an example: My "A" topic will be my regular Thursday debate using the topic of April Fool's Day. On Friday when I often write about mysteries I will be talking about Babylon. On Saturday I always have a review of my past week's posts and the upcoming posts so on April 3 my topic will be Capsulization. I will resume the challenge on Monday with one of my Persnickety Penman installments-- D as in Dictionary. See how easy it is. I don't really have to change my format of what I normally write, just come up with topics that correspond with the letter of the day. I printed out a calendar grid for the month of April and x'ed out the Sundays and wrote the letters in each of the daily squares. In less than an hour I came up with all of my topics for each letter. And I can still change them if I want---I probably will change some. It was fun just filling in the 26 topics and imagining the possibilities.
Eno/Wobble
You don't mention this to anyone, don't talk about how you feel,
Lisa flashes that smile and then moves her hand amongst the contents which have appeared within the cut grass between us.
A. The Provisions
AUTUMN in Wellington tends to arrive first with a thud in the form of an icy southerly front followed by a relapse into ‘Indian summer’ and then an inevitable descent into winter. Unlike the majority of the population I relish autumn as it marks the start of the cooler months which I far prefer to the muggy heat of summer and the windy fury of spring.
Even from a fandom perspective, there’s something satisfying about having a canonical paratext, so to speak. Even when fandom breaks definitively from the authorized accounts of the show it benefits from having them there to frame and shape the conversation. Fandom necessarily assumes a paratext to the show, and having at least some common ground in that paratext makes all of this much simpler.
To that end, I purchased what is referred to as a "park model" - a small, one bedroom, single wide manufactured home that is anchored to the desert. They are limited to 400 square feet, so you can imagine how small it is, but it feels huge in comparison to the motorhome. I now have a full queen sized mattress and a recliner. Wow.
Had no idea the kind of idiots who were hangin’ around
Historically, I don’t think this is as unprecedented as it is made out to be. Certainly, suspending a General Manager, Head Coach, and a high ranking assistant along with the monetary fine is a stiff punishment, but this has been done before. You just have to look a little further back to the 1960’s.
Today there is a plethora of partnerships with which local councils work. However, unlike Crime & Disorder Reduction Partnerships and Children’s Centres, this doesn’t seem to have increased our grasp of what our area needs across the board.
The elephant came crashing through the ceiling of the opera house amid a shower of plaster dust and roofing tiles and landed in the lap of a noblewoman, a certain Madam Bettine LaVaughn, to whom the magician had intended to present the bouquet.
After 14 minutes, Fox broke the silence: "Are you still reading the case?"
Offices in this part of the world don’t need much of an excuse to have cake orgies. Leaving, starting, retiring, birthdays, anniversaries, births, deaths, you name it and the cakes come out and the tea is brewed.
Because I was a slacker, I didn't look through backpacks until I was packing lunches Sunday night, whoopsie! Kyan was the star student this week and needed to decorate a poster and fill in facts - All About Him! Let's just say we missed bedtime!
That's how I feel right now. Sometimes I just have to quiet down, let go and trust. Surrender and go with the flow, knowing that even if I can't see the bigger picture, I am going where I am meant to.
Sarah Urquhart
But as the plane started to fly high with a sudden increase of pressure, the boy now started to shriek. He cried and cried, stopping only once in a while to suck the bottle intermittently. No one or nothing can stop him from crying now—his father and mother’s alternating hugs, massaging his back, stroking his hair, standing up and walking around while holding the baby. None of this worked. Many passengers who were near enough to hear this baby shriek started to fumble about with their bodies and made nasty faces. I was one of them. I kept making ugly faces for the next thirteen hours, until the plane landed at LAX.
If at any point in the last 24-48 hours you found yourself narrowly avoiding a collision with a formula can (or breast pump) moving at mach speed past your head, you are a new father. Congratulations! Welcome to the miraculous and joy-filled game of Parenthood.
Ally Condie's Matched was one of the hyped releases at BEA. I was able to hear her speak on the YA panel, and was so impressed by her. She's the kind of person I think I could be friends with, but more importantly to this work, she gets teens, in spite of the fact that she knows she's not one of them -- a hopelessly uncool adult -- because she's a high school teacher, and she remembers what it's like to be a teenager herself.
You are like a mystic fountain,
Furthermore, as Craig goes on to make clear, even if the intention is simultaneous with the event that it causes, this does not mean that it is not *causally* or *explanatorily* prior to the event: the man’s intention to hold onto the tree-branch is what explains his holding onto the tree branch, not the other way around. I see this as a “the dog wags the tail, the tail doesn’t wag the dog”-kind of point.
Pom is currently offering a coupon to receive $1 off these yummy Pom Poms. Get your coupons by clicking this link:
So, about the lady. She was, hmmmm....maybe mid-forties, sandy blonde hair cut into a longish bob (hard to tell, cuz I think she had taken out some of her paint color issues on her locks), glasses, a black shirt, and, well, that's about all I remember. Does this really matter? No. Just thought you'd like to create her character in your head to make the story more interesting.
-Isaac was actually born with an imperforate anus, which just means that his little bottom hole isn't there. So that was kinda shocking, but actually made sense with some of the ultrasounds that we had seen problems with his bowels in. That was surgery number one, & it went really well, but because all of his tummy area is kind of tender right now so they're not wanting to route any tubes down there just yet - hence the VAD. So back to the bowel stuff - right now they have just re-routed everything temporarily to a little sack on the outside of his tummy, but in the next few months they'll do another surgery & then another or two over time & can get everything all fixed up for him & working. It apparently isn't a super uncommon thing...& surgery went really well it seems like. We're still waiting to make sure everything healed up & is working as it should - but it sounds like it all went really well!There could have been a lot more complications with his kidneys, bowels & intestines, but all of those are looking okay :)
The answer lies in a dispensational change. He was given the keys to the Kingdom butIsraelrejected the offer of that Kingdom. We saw that offer in Acts 3:19,20.
Mwah & Hugs Angie xo
My neighbor just down the road -- "Mr. W." -- has a huge garden. He was born on a farm & the affinity with the soil is a part of him. I admire how well he does each year with his garden production.
So at least I didn't bonk because I'm a wuss. Just a moron.
hallmark of the Islamist group The sect has been blamed for scores of
So my question to all feet sufferers is this – Where do you buy your shoes from ?! Do you suffer too?
Seventh Doctor Season 25
For many people the only association they have with the town is it features in Bram Stoker’s “Dracula”, and the ruined abbey up on the hill definitely has a suitably atmospheric look to it. Needless to say there’s a certain amount of cashing in on the attendant tourism, and I don’t think I’ve seen so many shops in one town where you can buy Gothic clothing and paraphernalia.
However, if you are looking for sturdy shoes that are good for walking then opt for the Pursuit from Stacy Adams. It is available in a grey suede colour. It is a 2-eyelet casual ankle boot that comes with a padded collar. The non-leather sole and suede upper gives it a distinctive look.
So here it is...my first play: free to copy, distribute and perform
`I don't much care where--' said Alice.
The lady actresses of today are mere fragments of her poise and class. Elizabeth Taylor is indeed a Lady of Grace. Her style remained Elegant throughout her career and her beauty never faltered.
The reason why I’m writing this post is because an old acquaintance from a forum I used to participate in wrote to me and asked me how my relationship was going. I laughed and wrote back, “It went!” She seemed sadder than I was about it- we were 2 out of 5 women on a forum where everyone thought we would end up with our affair partner. My acquaintance is now married to her partner, and the other three are either married or living together. I am the only one who isn’t still with their partner, which is one of the reasons why I haven’t been on that forum in a long time. While some of the reason is because I’m slightly embarrassed at how much I defended we were “different” (and other members agreed with me), the other reason is because it’s painful to be on there and hear about how happy the other four women are…clearly, they were right that their situation was unique, and clearly, mine was not. There were over 50 women on that forum, so our 5 “unique” affair relationships stood out.
Having respect for other people in your heart, mind, and actions is more important than any word.
and now i'm telling all y'all!
red for stun, yellow for down, green is up but no tackle-zone: bone head/stupid.
And you’d be so wrong for thinking that I’m complicated and that I'm deep,
YG97 1
-Straw Wreath (keep the plastic on)
I went to work two weeks following my high school graduation. (I had worked part-time gigs in high school, but it was now time for the big leagues.) I was hired by an insurance company and it was an amazing job. I got to sort mail and push a cart down long dark hallways and deliver the mail to different offices. The office was located in San Francisco's financial district. It was really fun, challenging and great for the first week, then I got the cart and my hand stuck somehow in an elevator door. I went home early because of my bruised hand.
...a little bit about me ~ my family lives in a circa 1855 house on 5 1/2 acres. I have 3 children ~ oldest daughter just graduated from SUNY - Oneonta (education major), my son is a computer engineering major at the University at Buffalo and the youngest will be a junior in high school in the fall and then there's my husband who is THE BEST! We celebrated our 27th anniversary on June 1st.
I love writing. It's the one way that I can be totally me! Sometimes people misunderstand the things that I say, but when writing, it all seems to come out and clear and totally together. I am note a blogger by day, but rather one by night. By day I work in the medical field. I have had the honor of being published in a few of my medical journals, as well as being featured in the Proverbs 31 Ministries magazine.
Liisa McCloy Kelly from Random House said that making an EPUB before EPUB 3 was “like waltzing with both hands tied behind your back and a weight on one foot.” (I think of it more as Tarantella in the dark while the stage shifts constantly underfoot) She said that Random House has 5 different eBook processes, the most complex of which requires teams of product managers, HTML coders, designers, R&D and testing. She recommends encouraging designers to keep an eye on digital conversion, to think about variable sizes.
Myth Tradition: Bring the homework packet for Iliad 20, which we’ll discuss in class.
Today, they are the mid-level leaders, along with some new associates, while working in positions of education and influence. Dohrn, for example, is an Associate Professor at the Northwestern University School of Law
1 (6 oz.) pkg. semi sweet chocolate chips
* You will NEVER have any time to yourself AT ALL.
Going Home: Elise
Gloating: Businessmen in a window laugh after placing a sign on their window above where Occupy Wall Street protesters were marching. It reads: ‘The harder I work, the luckier I get’
If one consciously understands their personal thinking style, and is able to recognize such things as negative self-talk and counter-productive behaviors, they are well on the way to affecting their mindset. Similar to learning, practice and repetition will enable and adjust the thought process. In time, the conscious re-framing, positive self-talk, and awareness becomes the new mindset.
O.K. so let's get started. I have sewn my paper to the cardstock. If I wasn't going to have sewn edges I would probably add the paint to the edges of each piece before layering and sticking down.
Only….there will be Goobers on our pillows tonight, instead of them fancy Yacht Club chocolates.
How about our lovely parent when they do the same thing to us?
Prislin R, Sawyer MH, DeGuire M, et al. Missed opportunities to immunize: psychosocial and practice correlates. Am J Prev Med 2002: 22: 165-169.
1 licenses
He brought the binoculars from the closet and adjusted them. His hands began to tremble as he focused on the girl and spotted the Angel tattoo on the ivory skinned bare arm. He removed the binoculars and looked again.
Overall: Too dark for me; as the book progressed, I found myself sadder and sadder, sinking under the gloom. I can handle it for a short story but not novel-length. Recommended for the more stalwart reader.
you can suggest a bit more complexity with
Feel free to share this article in its entirety and include Sabrina Risley’s Bio information below along with live link back to this blog post. Thank you. Sabrina Risley founded Behind The Moon, Inc.® in 2003, a Colorado-based networking organization that sets itself apart with its motto “grow your business by helping others grow theirs.” Behind The Moon offers several networking events across Colorado’s Front Range that attract professionals who network to give rather than get. You will find Sabrina speaking to audiences about effective networking techniques, the power of partnerships, and principles of service and giving as a means to grow a business. Sign up for Sabrina’s free report, Networking For Success at http://www.behindthemooninc.com/index.php/free-report.
Apparantly keeping with the water theme. Huge white head this time, cloudy again but with a more orange look to it. No clue what hop I'm smelling here, but it smells like (I'm sorry), kind of a dumpster outside a restaurant, that eerie sweet smell. Taste of the beer is not bad, strong hops, low malt, something I would like if I were on my Extra IPA kick. With this weather though I'm nearly ready for Bock season. The hops on this one are pretty tough for me, probably a big amount of American and German hops. I don't taste the apricots they say are in there. High 2 Stars.
What would a holiday be without the chance to win some fantastic goodies. Head on over to enter. (click on picture)
Finally, I'm ready to put my body and health at the top of my priority list.
And, yeah, I could stand to burn a few calories.
I made a 3t in blue and an 18-24 mo. in gray. I found the fabric at Joann's, it's just a plain old quilting cotton, but I thought the print was cute. Both dresses have the same matching blue buttons. I wanted to put gray buttons on the blue dress but I couldn't find any that coordinated with the gray fabric. Oh well, they are still cute and the pattern was very easy. I can't wait to see the girls wearing them on Easter.
Now, head on over to the HSS challenge site and check out what else the DT came up with and play along in our banner bash!
That book is about how control destroys a relationship. If a parent is abusive, the book can still help, but seriously the best advice for you if you are abusive is to GET SOME HELP! Stop abusing your kids, stop yelling at them, stop hitting them, give them a voice that isn't yours. Abusers have a way of taking away the voice of other people, which is, in part about control.
Thanks Penny for organising a wonderful series of workshops though out 2011 - if you would like to join Penny's mailing list to find out the 2012 workshop schedule pop on over to her website here.
Tomorrow's post will include some yummy recipes for you.
James Cook
-a national debt that is threatening to top $13 trillion, much of which is borrowed from a country that is looking to unseat us as the pre-eminent world power
Ava's mother gets ovarian cancer and dies. Grandpa Sawtooth is placed in a home a month before her death. Ava starts doing her mother's act. A new theme park called The World of Darkness opens on the mainland and Swamplandia's visitors drop off dramatically. It is easier to get to (tourists have to take a 40 minute ferry to get to Swamplandia). Ava rarely thinks "dad" --- she usually thinks "the Chief" instead.
Historic Reynolda Village
I did all the flowers myself. I stopped by Sam's and seriously bought them out of white flowers. Then, I looked for anything "plum"...and then picked up a few green stems, greenery, and baby's breath. I think I spent about $150 all together and I was able to make 10 mini arrangements for the head table, a large arrangement for the food table, and 10 more "small" arrangements for the guest tables...I also make 22 tussy mussy bouquets that went down the center aisle in the sanctuary. (I wasn't in the ceremony, so I don't have any pictures yet. BOO. I made 30 of the tussy mussies (paper cones with a ribbon handle)...I'll have to do a post on them when I get some pictures from the photographer.)
A few pictures below . . .
Bullshit words like 'going forward', 'facilitate' and 'in addition'.
How big, how deep
or either location of Moeder Lambic, and nowhere else.
Nobody can quite understand why I've bought this but I can visualise how amazing it will look when finished. AAAaaand I've seen how much the restored versions of these go for on Ebay... Its all about Mid Century Modern furniture at the moment.
“Oh, you mean rih-kah-tah?”
cold like this calls for cookies, like these, and tea. these little nuggets are wheat and dairy free, and still taste pretty darn good!
I had a 'ball' doing this class, just loved every minute and learnt SO much.
10/03 – Eureka, CA – Red Fox Tavern
Got it? Now QUIT BEING A FUCKING IDIOT.
Edit: when I went on Thurs 23Feb, there wasnt the crepe station but was replaced by a quite good penang laksa! The desserts were diff too, there was this yummy blueberry mousse cake, green tea mousse w red bean cream and durian crepe cake! The above post was on a Sunday night!
I love the bright, fun colors. For the title, I used some American Crafts Thickers from my stash. The tag behind the title is also from my stash but not sure where I originally got it. I used a color mist from October Afternoon - Comet Tail orange - to color the Heidi Swapp banner and to add some drops of color to the background paper. The journaling spot is die cut from Spellbinders Nestabilities Labels One.
When Palin’s map became an issue, Rep. Chris Van Hollen, leader of the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee (DCCC), rushed on MSNBC to denounce it, telling Chris Matthews:
regret to inform you that I am unable to accept your refusal to offer me
Let me describe what she looked like. She wore tight blue jeans that rolled up around her ankles. Blue ballet slipper shoes with pink socks. Her shirt was nice and loose, except it had glittery polkadots–also it was tight around the shoulders and it squeezed the excess fat around her thin arms. Her blonde hair was tied up in a way that if you saw her from behind you might think she’s twenty. She was a young looking grandmother, if that makes sense. Her face was really saggy, probably from too much alcohol in her life–but you could only tell her approximate age by being close to her.
(Please note that my translation is the NIV translation… The translation on the box itself appears to be the King James translation.)
The surgeon we went to, Dr. Elizabeth Coryllos, explained that she would do the frenotomy in the office and she would numb him under his tongue. I began to cry. She assured me it would not be painful to him and he would be able to nurse right away. I told her that was not why I was crying. I explained to her I was upset that I was not able to solve this on my own, that as a professional and as a mom I felt like a failure. Then she gave me the best advice I have ever heard as a mom. She said even if I was the best race car driver in the world and I had the best car ever built I could not win the race if a tree fell across the track. Someone would have to remove the barrier so my car and I could continue on our journey. It was not my fault that nursing was not going well. I had the best baby in the world and I was the best mom for him; we just needed to remove the barrier to continue on our journey.In an AAP newsletter on breastfeeding, the article Congenital Tongue-Tie and its Impact on Breastfeeding (PDF) explains the four types of tongue tie and how they can affect breastfeeding.
Thank you so much for joining along with me for this week's challenge :) I hope you all head on over to visit Laurel (click HERE) to see complete details and leave her some love :)
The draft came and went last weekend, and I came away very impressed with the Cleveland Browns draft. As I wrote previously, the Browns had, and still have some holes to plug, but they certainly eliminated a good share of them in this draft. The NFL is certainly a passing league, but the weather turns bad in Cleveland earlier than most cities, and with the winds whipping across Lake Erie, a strong running game is needed in Cleveland. For this very reason, I am glad the Browns traded up one spot to ensure they would get running back Trent Richardson of Alabama. Keep in mind that the Browns had 13 draft picks, so giving away 3 late round picks to move up one spot did not hurt the Browns.
HÁ: And did you notice the needles? They’re mallets.
Kimberly =:8
The commission had in the Johnson file, his addresses to both homes, home telephone number, his wife's place of employment, his driver license number, make, model, color of the car he drove, tag number to the car. They knew of his two traffic tickets and how the tickets were resolved. The name and location of the churches he pastored were known by the commission. The above photo of Johnson came from his file.
'Yes' he replied
I grabbed the Ibizarre Tweed Fur Jacket for Lazy Sunday while I was in the store grabbing the landmark for this blog because….. well, just look at it……!
Owned by the Stamoulis family through its company Ryssal-Three, the property has been on the market twice in recent years without success. In July 2000, it had an asking price of $9.95 million and in September that year the asking price had dropped to $9 million.
Ideally, I would have liked to have done individual reviews on each of the books, but since I am not normally disciplined enough to take that kind of time in between such good books, I didn't. So I will provide my opinion on the series as a whole.
“It sounds impossible, Darcy,” I said. “We might as well get started.”
HUNTSVILLE, TEXAS — Beunka Adams’ stay of execution is in jeopardy.
So I did nothing.
-The acknowledgment of God as the creator of all things and progenitor of morality
Opener for topic meeting on 10/25/2011
What if we used it when we traveled?
On another note, I got a sweet potato roll today for lunch…thinking it would be as good as the one I had in NY…total fail! The sweet potato was crunchy! Eww! You can’t eat half soft, half crunchy sweet potatoes in a sushi roll!!! At least my cucumber avocado roll was refreshing. It was SO hot today I didn’t feel like eating at all, but I thought to myself ‘why, a nice sushi roll would be wonderful on such a hot day,’ (talking in weird snobby accent!) lol wrong! I would have rather rolled my arm in rice and ate that haha I think I’m over sushi for a while now….stupid sweet potato! haha
So, in no particular order, I’d like to recommend:
Anyway, we missed most of the first half of Cats, ran into the theater about ten minutes before intermission. We took our seats right in the middle of the Jellicle Ball. Those damn cats were dancing all over the damn place and the audience members were clapping in unison and cheering. It was deafeningly loud and there were strobe lights involved.
Honduras's announcement coincided with the end of discussions at the World Health Organization (WHO) concerning a Framework Convention on Tobacco Control. The proposed Convention, which will cover illicit trade in tobacco but will not be specifically directed at trade mark and intellectual property issues, pits countries with health issues arising from tobacco consumption against tobacco producing nations.
BLITZER: What do you think of President Obama and his efforts over
Mr. Monty Santo: (authoritatively) Are you the farmer for this land?
Yum, yum!! Thanks so much for stopping by.
Issues:
-My Celebrity Crushes
The active nest is dead center on the lower catwalk. You can just see a tail to the right of the pole. To the upper right is an old nest (I presume).
the weakness of our flesh supply.
On the other hand, if he’s tying his procreativity to his, ahem…, near poverty, perhaps he should have kept is dick in his pants and not had so many kids?
Remember when stock broker firms had offices on virtually every corner? Business could only be done with a broker, and paper-intensive transactions took seven days to complete. Today, technology allows customers to control their investments. All transactions can be completed online from anywhere in the world and confirmed in milliseconds. And it’s all accomplished with reduced costs for both the investment firm and the consumers.
So, after making my carrot lemonade, I decided to take those peels, and make limoncello. This time with Truvia. I basically took the peels from 6 lemons and 2 oranges (just the peel, no pith, use a vegetable peeler before cutting). I put those in a container and covered with a 750 ml bottle of 100 proof vodka. I covered with plastic and let sit on the counter for five days.
Serve with corn or Mexicorn, extra BBQ sauce and baked beans OR that new frozen corn/black bean/tomato blend I found in the freezer section.
For the pasta, I used the angel hair variety. Next time, I want penne. Anything will do! Get crazy and try bowtie pasta. Yeah, do that!
Now the girl and the beach and the train and the ship are all gone
Of course there is more than one book which I’ve wanted to read but haven’t. There are many more than are on this list, and still other books which I would love if I knew to seek them.
Graham Dewyea: Hello, and welcome to An Hour with an Angel, with Linda Dillon, the channel for the Council of Love, and Steve Beckow, editor of the2012scenario. Our guest today is Archangel Michael. So with that, I’ll pass it over to you, Steve.
Oh hey, I just realized that Carole, her sister, and I failed to convene a meeting of the organization we founded many years ago. BOTA, or Bring On The Asteroids, is dedicated to periodically becoming so frustrated by the general suckiness of people that we throw up our hands and welcome an asteroid bombardment that will wipe out humans and allow the rise of a new sapient race. Hopefully the bonobos who are generally groovy and prefer sex over violence.
If Mr. Palm thinks otherwise, he needs to find us a statement after 1943 on full biblical inerrancy . . . . He won’t be able to.
By: Hopeingaza
In a repeat election, likely in June, a more centrist vote may emerge.
Message From the Law – Sic Alps
Baird Brewing Company / Fishmarket Taproom Kurofune Porter
Gingrich Accuses Romney of Pious Bbaloney: Newt Gingrich accused Republican presidential front-runner Mitt Romney of “pious baloney” Sunday for saying he’s not a career politician, demanding in campaign debate that Romney “just level with the American people.”
Ladies and gentlemen, straight out of the dustiest vaults, behold the debut album from the El MidaZ Affair…not only the oldest known hip hop recording, but certainly one of the dopest.
The first group of turnips are finally starting to bulb out as well! Soon I will be pulling that row, making more room for the broccoli to grow and for the second group of turnips to get bigger. I'm also getting ready to plant round four of radishes. They are growing better than I could have wished for, and they are a very tasty treat in my daily salads. I can't wait until I get to add the tomatoes and cucumbers!
What I'm saying is every once in awhile I wish something would happen similar to some of these movie plots that would test how I would really act. Something like a minor alien/zombie/robot invasion. That way I'd know if I'm adequately trained for the real deal. So far I've been in a couple high pressure situations, and I acted instinctively (and correctly), but there were no flesh-eating corpses, mind-scrambling extraterrestrials or homocidal machinery nearby at those times (at least none I was aware of).
How’d it go: Also great!!! Not much else to say!!!!
The Lounge is Knutsford’s new stylish champagne and cocktail bar located on Princess Street and with its opening night only a few days before, and seeing their video of the refurbishment on YouTube, I popped in to see what all the fuss was about!
Yesterday I wrote about making memories. And that is just what we decided to do last night.
In some ancient cultures, like the Celts, the term tying the knot was quite literal. Symbolic cords tied the couple together, symbolizing their union as one. Some ceremonies just draped the cords over them while others actually bound the couple together at the wrists. The ceremony itself was a very simple ritual called handfasting. The bride and groom were bound together by a ceremonial rope, cord, a piece of the family's tartan or other symbolic wrap.
They are cute and I do like them though the proportions were never quite right and it was simply time for something different.
We did take a dressage lesson and school xc yesterday, I'll write a post about that tomorrow or the next day. I wanted to just post about the show today first.
One Piece furniture covers are soft, attractive and available in sizes for all your furniture. Drape them over couches, loveseats and easy chairs in one easy motion to protect the back, arms and seat of your valuable furniture. One Piece Linen Pet Covers are machine washable, so you can renew their fresh look time and time again, simply by tossing them in the wash with any regular load of laundry. For you and your beloved pets, it's win-win! Kids and animals alike will enjoy the freedom of being able to lounge and play together on household furniture. Enjoy the company if your animals while saving every piece in your living room from dirty claws and excited paws!
"One of the ordinary modes, by which tyrants accomplish their purposes without resistance, is, by disarming the people, and making it an offense to keep arms." - Supreme Court Justice Joseph Story
Speaking about press freedom today in Sri Lanka, Mr. Tissainayagam said, �the situation is very dire. � Dissent is what the government fears.�
The house featured in the film is an actual house in Simi Valley, California. It is still standing today and is still occupied by the same owners as when the film was made.
Giving me all but stopping just shy of glory
The U.S., in purple with a Gini coefficient of 0.450, ranks near the extreme end of the inequality scale. Looking for the other countries marked in purple gives you a quick sense of countries with comparable income inequality, and it’s an unflattering list: Cameroon, Madagascar, Rwanda, Uganda, Ecuador. A number are currently embroiled in or just emerging from deeply destabilizing conflicts, some of them linked to income inequality: Mexico, Côte d’Ivoire, Sri Lanka, Nepal, Serbia.
These affordable games are portable versions of favorites such as CONNECT 4, HUNGRY HUNGRY HIPPOS, GUESS WHO? and BATTLESHIP. When the vacation is over, kids can pack these games in a backpack for fun on the school bus or during an after-school play date. The games are packed full of fun and great to take anywhere! Make sure to grab some before traveling this holiday season! Check out hasbro.com for more info!
Training Pants
Parents warned that white girls as young as 12 are being screwed by older Muslim men but Police and groups with responsibility to protect women pretend it is not happening or that this grooming our youngsters is not racial. Parents claim that there are networks to use our young girls while the authorities are frightened to do anything. The issue is not that they are having sex with under-age girls but that they are using our women for gratification when they have their own women.
When we begin to follow the path of Gratitude, a greater inner healing begins. This has been my experience with Gratitude to ALL THAT IS for ALL THAT IS. The gap is really the amount of “awareness of the process” of aligning to Gratitude from a deeper more complete perspective.
It really was heartbreaking, furbabies mean so much. I would've been just as inconsolable.
Rodwell had a good chance to leave us in tears but his header went wide.
And, I once had an unfortunate encounter with a Nobel Laureate--a man whom I admired greatly. (Not a bad encounter, just unfortunate.)
Here's what else we did!
Mother's Day for me has become like a second birthday and I like to milk it for all it is worth.
Compared with 10 years ago, when Americans overall favored environmental protection by 12 percentage points (52% to 40%), all groups have moved in the direction of energy prioritization, though Republicans have shifted much more so than either independents or Democrats.
Cheers!!
This name gives a clearer clinical description than many of the eponyms used previously (Iceland Disease, Akureyri's Disease, Epidemic Neuromyasthenia) or invented subsequently (Post viral syndrome, Chronic Fatigue Immune Dysfunction Syndrome).
“Apportionment. The process by which legislative seats are distributed among units entitled to representation. The U.S. Constitution provides for a census every ten years, on the basis of which Congress apportions representatives according to population; but each state must have at least one representative.”
Remember the little blackboard on Carly’s room? It says “Have Spencer take lemonade stand to basement.” I wonder what kind of out-of-the-ordinary junk the Shays have in their basement.
Recently, he discovered that when someone is peacefully sleeping, it is excellent fun to sneak into the quilt and attack their legs. He is also very bad at sneaking, being black and white he stands out rather a lot.
As always, you can email me with any questions, I love to hear from you! BeachBodyCoachLindsey@gmail.com
5. Don't follow your list in order. For example, I usually write my grocery list as things run out. By the end of the week, I have a big messy list that runs me all over the store. Granted, it may cause problems if you keep passing the chip or cookie aisles, but if you stick on some running shoes (because, HEY, this is a workout), you may be able to stay a bit more focused!
Ten years ago I couldn’t have made up, nor written a story like this: Why would, I?
how doeth he still kick that can
I can not say enough positive things about Kettle Cuisine. I just wish that they sold it in every local Grocery store!
Instantly waterproofs, refreshes, and protects any mascara all day, without the typical drying or clumping. Its advanced, lightweight formula glides on smooth, dries quickly, and gives your lashes a touchably soft lacquer finish that lasts all day.
While prowling the blogosphere this afternoon, I came across a new (to me) favorite - Pewter + Sage. Sarah is expecting a baby as well so I've been having a blast reading all about her nursery design and inspiration.
His cold, calculating message reveals a deep dishonesty many of us still did not dream Mr. Obama was capable of. It is a duplicity in allegiance unthinkable for an elected American president. Literally, he overrides the interests of American voters who will go to the polls with those of Moscow and Tehran, with whom he will deal after his re-election.
1. I don’t necessarily believe in Religion, but I do believe there is a God, a higher power who watches over us. I don’t believe we’re just in this alone.
Congratulations to all of those students who participated in this year’s NaNoWriMo (National Novel Writing Month) contest! The group was very successful and each of the students have started a fantastic novel of their own. The time and effort they have put in has been astounding!
Brains? Where?
So, I hope that water changes are a part of your tank regime.
Because our feelings are one
Jack’s father loses his job and the family has to leave town. The uprooting is the most painful the boys have experienced. Everything is lost, it seems, friends, the house, the neighborhood, memories, … But among the loss, we hear the graceful voice of Jack’s mother: “The only way to be happy is to love. Unless you love, your life will flash by… Do good, wonder, hope.” Yet poignantly, she experiences the most devastating blow later, the death of her own son. We hear her heartbreaking whisper in voice over: “Where were you? Did you know?” Again, reiterating the questions that were on Job’s mind.
A few weeks ago I made my own laundry detergent and I have to say I have been pretty happy with it. I love that it is all natural, plus it's super cheap. The only thing is I need to find an all natural stain remover for heavy stains because some are hard to get out of baby clothes. I would love any suggestions.
DRINK
Our biggest piece of advice is to organize and research. Give yourself only one or two tasks at a time so as it does seem overwhelming. Everything will and does get done, but having a focus helps keep you sane. If you are planning to send save the dates or a wedding website, this might be a good place to start. This takes some of the stress out of having to choose another vendor and helps get the bride and groom excited for what is to come. If an engagement party is being planned, it is also a good time to focus on that and have some fun before diving into some of the other tasks. If the engagement party is the only pre-wedding party that you will be having(i.e. no bridal shower), bride and grooms usually opt to register. If this is the case, registering for the party before the invites are mailed will also be priority.
- In a seloka of the Mahabharata, narrated by the figure of a weapon of mass destruction is a result similar to the present nuclear weapons.
At the end of the last Commission in 2004, an evaluation took place which highlighted major obstacles to 'progress'. One of these areas was the requirement on unanimity in the Council on Justice and Home Affairs.
That’s not true. It is not all about seeing homosexuals become hetereosexuals. This is not the message of the gospel. The gospel is about all types of sinners (like me) who are unbelievers becoming believers. The gospel of Jesus Christ is not discriminatory, it is all inclusive: we are all sinners. I am pretty consistent in talking to all types of people about Christ. This is the thing that encourages me in this whole thing: the gospel of Christ is being presented. God will forgive people. He will give a clean-slate to all who turn from sin and trust in Jesus.
And don't you just adore those pegs her hubs installed? Genius. And the blue walls... pitter patter! And if you think she did a great job here, wait til you check out more of her blog, she is an organizing guru. She even did a major clothes organizing overhaul that had me mega impressed!
Kindred Spirit
3/4 cup coffee
To yourself: respect.
Speak to your soon :)
¼ cup veggie broth
The quality of the bluebird images isn’t the greatest, but there will be plenty of better opportunities later in the Spring, after they have settled in and aren’t so skittish. If the normal pattern of arrivals holds true, the American Goldfinches and Western Tanagers will be along within a month. Although this happens every year, it is always exciting to see them come back, as they announce the season of renewal. Watching the dormant trees fill with leaves, seeing the dry grass become overtaken by new growth and interspersed with wildflowers, welcoming the offspring of livestock and wildlife; all are amazing and refreshing to the soul.
Conservatives have a clear either/or choice. Either they support life in a democracy with equal opportunity and adequate pay, or they must admit to the fact that the course they are on leads inevitably to plutocracy, inequality, non-democracy, and inescapable poverty for a large part of the population. If they want to claim that all persons must be responsible for themselves, they must support the rights of all persons to a Living Wage sufficient to pay for health care and savings for old age. It’s a clear choice. You can’t vote for unequal pay and then say you are for democracy.
Aside from going slightly over my allotted time (next time I do a panel presentation, I'm going to have a timer right in front of me), my only regret about SXSW Interactive has been not getting to fully immerse myself in it due to time-sensitive projects at work, gearing up for SXSW Music, Kate's busy schedule, tax preparation and wanting to see my son for a couple of hours over the weekend. There's a lot of potential synergy between emerging technologies and public health in everything from disease management to patient advocacy to data management. Here's hoping SXSW Interactive's embrace of health continues in coming years.
.."In the late 1880s, the body of a 16-year-old girl was pulled from the Seine. She was apparently a suicide, as her body showed no marks of violence, but her beauty and her enigmatic smile led a Paris pathologist to order a plaster death mask of her face.
The other undertone I thought could possibly be there is that King on several occasions makes references to the fact that Cujo is a good dog. He didn’t want to do the things he wound up doing. He simply became the victim of a terrible disease that turned him into something completely different than what he is. Kind of sounds like something someone might think about themselves while in the deep pit of drug addiction. They might not want to be doing the things to their friends and family that they are, but the addiction takes over and turns them into something completely different. (Now, before you jump on my case here, I do recognize there is a subtle difference. Drugs addicts are responsible for their situation in that they chose to get involved, and they can choose to quit – as difficult as it might be for them. Cujo did not choose to get rabies, and once he got it there was nothing he could do about it. Though, it’s not hard to see how someone in the grip of addiction might try to take the argument of being a victim).
I am not going to make it 10 days. That’s how long Prudy, our boxer pup, has to wear the “cone” since she was spayed. Somehow, we are supposed to keep this hyper dog “calm” for 10 days so she doesn’t pop her stitches. Talk about impossible! The first two days we had the hard plastic cone, aka the lampshade, aka the satellite dish. It was awful! Pru would walk past things and knock them over. We lost an entire potted plant to the plastic cone. We would take her outside and the cone would get caught on the door, trees, you name it.
I woo women with my sensuous and godlike trombone playing, I can pilot bicycles up severe inclines with unflagging speed, and I cook Thirty-Minute Brownies in twenty minutes. I am an expert in stucco, a veteran in love, and an outlaw in Peru.
I just finished this cloche. It is sitting on our family room coffee table.
I can hear his cries, my Irishman, now lost at sea
Agriculture Commissioner James Comer also supports legalization, arguing that industrial hemp could yield more per acre than corn and soybeans. He sees hemp as a viable alternative to tobacco, a once-stalwart crop that has been on the decline in Kentucky.
John L. Hochheimer
"Sneezy Waldera"
Preventing deaths is what Kassi and Caleb are now focused on accomplishing. Kassi has poured herself into research and now knows more about what she could have been looking for.
--hear His Word say,
I love all the lights on houses and the Mesa Temple.
But there is an ominous explanation that lay behind this folly—an even greater folly: (1) They “did not remember the Lord their God, who had rescued them from the hands of all their enemies,” and (2) they “failed to show kindness” (Judg. 8:34-35).
Being that the players are in shells today it is very hard to take much of anything from practice today for the running back group. However, both Chris Polk (Washington) and Doug Martin (Boise State) showed nice burst and acceleration from the little I was able to see of them today. Surely this will be a solid battle as well this week as I have both rated pretty closely and their performance this week will go a long way in separating themselves from one another in the minds of talent evaluators. Both players came in very strong with Martin showing up at a strong 5-9 219 lbs., while Polk came in at a sturdy 5-10 224 lbs. Both have the look of potential feature backs in the NFL with the capability to produce for whichever team chooses to draft them. Issiah Pead (Cincinatti) however did not look the part and I was disappointed to see him weigh in at a slight 5-9 193 lbs. I didn’t get to see much of any of Ohio State’s Daniel “Boom” Herron however and will have more on him in the coming days.
And, yes, I broke down and jumped on the Chiang Mai Dragon bandwagon and ordered pillows in the mocha color way. I know it’s been seen everywhere on blogs but the combination of colors is still my favorite:
The radioman had his chin tucked into his chest and his shoulders pushed forward into the straps of his pack as he carried a portable radio in addition to the rest of his gear. Manny carried most of the three men’s food and cooking gear as well as a hand-held radio formerly owned by one late Chinese scout.
But, if Iran continues to sabre rattle in the Gulf Oman, fresh pressures from rising oil prices may resurface.
For a voluntary group like Transition Newcastle, it is so important that we make our meetings something that people want to come to. I think this weekend worked well in creating an environment that is inviting and I hope we all felt energised and enthusiastic.
A quiet Saturday at our house (read: boring Saturday). Prince Charming had to work and JB is still under the weather, so we played at home all day. The kids made a bakery in their bedroom. Miss M was the brains behind the idea but JB was happy to help, and then destroy, and then help, and then destroy. It was very cute, and although I thought we might have enough play food for two small children, today's adventure indicates we do not. So I am going to try my friend Megan's idea, she crafted some cute baked goods with her son...check it out!
Rich died Tuesday at her Santa Cruz home from complications from rheumatoid arthritis, said her son, Pablo Conrad. She had lived in Santa Cruz since the 1980s.
And I like that.
That technology of theft and deception that has been exported from the United States through their promotion of this fraud as the paradigm of global finance is an obscenity that has set the seeds of its own destruction.
I hate all movements that disturb my pose,
I studied A level art then went on to complete a general art foundation course before studying on a three year Visual Communication degree course at Edinburgh College of Art, where I specialised in illustration.
Disc Four: Ieodo
Thank you for protecting her.
First, I started with the hardest parts. In this case, the gun was trickiest. I colored the metal parts of the gun with C1, C3, N5. Notice the strong contrast between darks/lights. This helps with the illusion of reflective metal.
Futur “MU” from JAPAN (Incoherent Scatter) site in ANTARTICA
But Gulen’s 85 schools in the United States which advance the establishment of a New Islamic World Order have received little national attention.
establish mobile police units in all
Many forms of cancer often lessen hunger. Persons suffering of the sickness find it not easy to eat due in part to stress, unease, queasiness, exhaustion and many, various side-effects of their treatments. Thus, with reduction in appetite, it is important to make sure that when they are ready to eat, cancer patients consume healthy foods that are high in protein and calories. Choosing foods such as olives, dried fruits and nuts are good choices. Make an attempt to stay away from unhealthy synthetic sugars that can be found in candies, sodas and other sweets as these sugars can help to disrupt the cell division process; which, when left unbalanced, can lead to the development of a number of cancers
Worse for Chen is his uncomfortable and embarrassing opposition to China’s population control agenda, a policy supported by the Obama administration and in particular the State Department, which is spendingtens of billions of dollars on such programs worldwide. Although the administration gives lip-service against coercive abortion and sterilization, it is simultaneously helping to finance the Chinese population control machine with tens of millions of dollars in subsidies to the United Nations Population Fund (UNFPA), which helps to administer China’s brutal one-child policy.
I had a lovely few days visiting DD as she can't be home for Easter due to Uni work, her final exams start next month. It was a shame the weather was so cold, but at least we didn't get any snow, unlike DH who was left at home!
Had a lovely night at Bracken Edge. Thai/oriental themed night. Won tons, satay chicken, temporah. Went to bed at 9:30. Woke up at 5:30 fully wide awake. Got a Tropicana orange and lime from the fridge, chucked the dog out my room and went back to land of slumber until 9.
* There is trust in farmers but lots of questions about farming. Yazmir said Americans question the practices used in farming and ranching. The negative words used to describe modern farming practices included: mass production, pesticides, big business, subsidies, chemicals, factory farming and animal cruelty.
First we walked east to the creek. Mostly, it was blocked by a fence, but I did find one place to reach it.
I paced behind its windows,
We’re quicker to abhor working conditions in Chinese factories than, say, in exploitative non-unionized U.S. workplaces.
"Go downstairs before I have to do something really bad to you"
Hubby stayed playing and said he be back to the chalet in an hour or so to make dinner. I told him he didn't need to cook, but he already had dinner planned so that is what he was going to do. He got back and I didn't notice anything until he bumped into the wall and said, "Alcohol sucks!" He was DRUNK! LOL! I knew he planned to drink, but I didn't pay attention to what or how much he was drinking, as he is not much of a drinker anymore. Well, someone should have paid attention, I guess. He was too funny and I watched him really closely. Once he got some food in him, he was a little better. He had talked about going back to the casino, but decided to stay in and watch a little tv and go to bed.
Here is a nice big version of the stunning cover on the Science Fiction Book Club's Omnibus edition of the Parasol Protectorate Vol 2. This edition is only available to club members (although sometimes they show up online for sale later) and is a hardback limited run containing the final two books in the series, Heartless and Timeless. It should be coming out in the USA right about the same time as Timeless.
frame to hang on a wall..... who knows.....
The Biotech Directive[2] defines subject matter that is excluded for moral or other reasons, such as parts of the human body, human embryos, methods of cloning humans, certain methods of changing genetic identity and certain transgenic plants.
Tim Minchin will be playing Judas Iscariot. Tim is a musical comedian who has had fantastic success with Matilda the musical which he was the co-writer of. The former Spice Girl Melanie C will be playing Mary Magdalene musical, she has had some experience in Blood Brothers in the West End. BBC Radio 1′s Chris Moyles will make his stage debut as King Herod.
The irony is that the very things that make a writer come up with a story - the frustration, even the anger at the lack of success and recognition - are the very themes that make the writing project work for the eventual audience.
But first, a disclaimer: Correct contact is still a mystical concept that I am beginning to understand, but I may talk out of my arse until I fully do. This means possible incorrect terminology, etc. You've been warned.
As I’ve chronicled over the last few months the brewjersey blog has always been in search of the best craft beer in South Jersey and Philly. I want to concentrate just on South Jersey for this post. To narrow it down even more, the area of South Jersey between Philadelphia, Wilmington and Glassboro. There are a few great craft beer bars in the area and I am including an interactive map to showcase some of these great bars. A few of these bars have been mentioned in previous posts and some will be mentioned here for the first time.
Lost.
Does China have the smarts to recognize that both alternatives that could follow from maintaining the currency peg are quite harmful to China itself?
It’s just been one of those days for me
I prefer to think of it as having a lot of RESOURCES!
I loved you baby, way back when
Inside the city limits, you can call the City Animal Shelter but if you are located outside the city limits, there is really no one to call for help. Rogers County does not have an animal shelter. This problem is left to volunteer organizations dedicated to helping abandoned and abused animals. These organizations work off of money from their own pockets and donations.
I feel like their marketing department should be FIRED.
But somebody prayed for you today
Thanks for visiting! and Happy New Year!!
Thanks to the pain pills, I have been in a pleasant fog since Monday, but I have the nagging suspicion that the President has been similarly disengaged since the day he took the oath of office.
#4063 Pork Sausage Patties (pre-cooked) $34.09 $35.99
The websites say that they give you energy, improve your sleep patterns, make produce last longer, attract money, and keep your pets safe if you put one on their collar. (Probably especially safe if you use the angel one, don't you think?)
-Commercial nuclear energy in the US has had one nuclear accident in its history since 1957 and no one died there. Over 33,000 people are killed each year in the United States in car or car related deaths; how could nuclear be any safer than it is?
The flexibility to engage an outside law firm
Civil law is somewhat different from criminal law and I thought that this was an ingenious way to compensate the Zimbabwean farmers for farms lost.
Due to a banking problem, many (including me) PCVs did not get paid on time. I was a few days into my scrumptious tomato paste and rice diet when another PCV came to visit, not only with her lovely smile – but also some food! I had fun showing her around my village and with two abazungu out and about, we were certainly the center of attention. While it’s easy to get stuck and held up on all the challenges of your site, it was really refreshing to have an outside perspective remind me of all the awesome things that make my site great. I may live in a food desert with no electricity for miles, but if those are my two challenges, I’ll take it.
I've recently started a small (very small!) not for profit organisation called, "Lia Nain Books For Timor". Lia Nain is a person in the village who is responsible for keeping tradition, story and culture alive and the idea of the little organisation is to collect stories from the Timorese, and to put them into books (mostly children's) and have them published and distributed across Timor (in Tetun) and Australia (in English). I guess the idea (and the passion!) is that there are SO many stories in Timor - of courage, strength, resilience, family, love and hope, and no one can tell them better than the people themselves. There is also a shortage of books in Tetun (although this is slowly increasing!) and a general lack of knowledge and understanding in Australia (and the world) about Timor.
I added some foam tape to the apple image, and adhered it to the sentiment.
Big Hugs Wanda
Tomato Slices
The fact that they’re not dead is a major break with even modern vampire mythology. The only exception I could think of was the Marvel Comics character Morbius: the Living Vampire. In Haig’s version of reality vampirism is a condition that can be passed on in one of two ways, by being inherited from one’s birth parents or by being converted in much the same fashion as described in Bram Stoker’s Dracula: a vampire's bite alone is not enough to turn a human into a vampire; the human, when near death, must drink the sire's blood. The only difference is that you don’t need to die afterwards, oh, and the age difference between converter and converted needs to be less than a decade.
-1 cup toasted bread crumbs or soda-craker crumbs
So far, I’m very happy with the new shoes, but I feel like it’s too early to really tell. My feet didn’t *seem* as tired, but am I projecting something? I’ll give my final decision in a week or so.
The melee broke out at 8:45 p.m. when a gang of 25 authority-haters, some wearing masks, wielded 8-foot-long metal pipes and tried to smash the windows of the Starbucks at Astor Place and Lafayette Street, police said.
Everybody smelled the big money that night in the bar. Mulcahy later learned that the final contract with Qaddafi called for a total payment of $35 million for 500,000 timers whose cost to supply, he knew, would be somewhere around $2.5 million. Even in the international-arms business, profits like that are not easy to come by.
This is not a retread of the usual debate of Traditional Jazz versus New Jazz. This is an examination of jazz losing it's way in order to find its way. Jazz transcending jazz to be...I don't even know - cosmic improvisation? tathagata-jam? The definition of jazz is not expanding, it is evaporating. The musicians in this documentary play improvisational music built on a number of influences beside the tradition of Jazz. They're soaking in the world and living a philosophy of improvisation within community, treating the music as a living organism. The music is incredible! Hip hop jazz orchestras, metal blues bop, and freestyle rhythmic vitality. The music is alive and well and going in new directions.
What has been your favorite project in this course, and why?
“Buck isn’t her breed either.”
RE-ARRANGING DECK CHAIRS ON THE TITANIC
I used to think it would be neat to keep bees for honey. I'm rethinking that.
Hataway said he doesn’t know what happened to Ocasio. Ocoee police said he’s a suspect in her disappearance, but he has not been charged.
These buyers preferred Indian ships, because of better jointing technology and elimination of metal sheeting. Indian shipbuilders had a special system where wood was seasoned in partial vacuum, with oils for timber improvement. British shipbuilders, colonialists ensured through tariff and other barriers, that Indian shipbuilding “was prevented from continuing to develop, even though it had a proven ability to adapt to changing technological needs” – and thus finally killing it. British naval superiority rested on Indian ships – and paid for by exploitation of Indian resources.
Simply click on the flower and use the keyboard arrows or click on the right or left arrow at the side of the picture.
It now measures 15"x 17", Rives BFK, collage, netting, silver leaf, molding paste, stencil, acrylic and wax thread.
The album was a bestseller soley based on the song Christmas Eve (Sarajevo 12/24) and it received very positive reviews for its innovation and approach to Christmas holiday music.
Someone once said that you need three things to make a hit song:
In either case, the house could be gaining heat from the exterior faster than the air conditioning can produce cold air. This could cause the system to run continuously. Again, it is recommended that all of these issues be reviewed by a qualified contractor.
The other reason I gave up on this book is I felt there was a fundamental hypocrisy at work. It purports, in passages like that quoted above, to analyze and, to some extent, judge Rogers’ treatment as an object of prurience by the press and the public at large. Well, yeah. And why exactly did you choose this subject for your book anyway? Perhaps because you realized that people are fascinated with crime, particularly crimes against attractive young women? Perhaps that’s why you also included the word sex in your title? Edgar Allan Poe got it and he didn’t feel the need to cast himself as a moral authority who is horrified by other people’s interest while he was doing it. Then again, he didn’t have Foucault and Derrida to tell him what was really going on.
Sci-Fi
This is a colossal series that I cannot rate high enough. It’s steamy with true love and romance in addition to being well-researched with characters that make you want to be a Mackenzie, for all their craziness. Jennifer Ashley writes under a few different names and has some other series (I enjoy her shifter series, too) but this is her best work. I’m eagerly awaiting the next two books in the series, The Seduction of Elliot McBride (Ainsley’s brother who was tortured in India and is trying to make a life back in England) and The Wicked Deeds of Daniel Mackenzie (cannot wait to hear Daniel’s story!!). Sadly, these two books aren’t due out until 2013, but Jennifer Ashley has plenty of other great books to read in the meantime. Check her out!
She replied to my note saying she wanted that overflow to help the others on the team, and that she knew another big chunk was coming she was getting ready to put in.
I HOPE that I am the friend she never expected, but will Always, always be there!
This morning I drove 40 miles round-trip through a snowstorm to see my doc, listening to school closing updates all the way. I finally have permission from my doc, as of today, to return to 40 hours a week of work, but no extra hours. That's great, and is an accurate reflection of my ongoing return to good health. But I'm sitting here trying to figure out how I'm going to squeeze 40 hours of work in around the medical needs of those I care for.
Scoop caramel topping into a saucepan and heat over low heat until caramel is soft and easy to stir. Pour the caramel over the nougat layer. Make sure to pour it evenly across the nougat covering as much of the surface as you can. This makes it easier to spread the caramel with a spatula. Let cool again by sticking it in the freezer for about 15 minutes.
But the true star of the show has undoubtedly been Conte himself. The manager arrived with only a modest CV – he had taken each of Bari and Siena up from Serie B, with an unsuccessful spell at Atalanta inbe tween – but the full backing of supporters who believed that as a former captain he would appreciate the significance of the role. He arrived declaring this team “must get used to using the word Scudetto again”, then promptly refused to acknowledge reporters’ suggestions that his team even had a shot at the title until the final two months of the season.
I took this photo while taking Tallis for a walk along the local cycle path. He and I only discovered the river section a few week ago, and this was the first time the ground was dry enough to allow us to make our way down the slope to the river edge without slip-sliding all the way. Well, Tallis could have made it quite happily, but he goes on the lead for this section and I wasn't about to let him tow me along!!!
Oasis Champagne supernova UK
I don't wanna live like you
On the fiction side, Ali Dougal said that the market continues to be dominated by PARANORMAL fiction, though ‘Twilight’ has finally seen a dip in demand. Those that are hot right now are about Angels and Werewolves. Books that have made it into film are big sellers for publishers, such as the Percy Jackson series. For Egmont, the biggest revenue continues to come from their backlist which includes Enid Blyton books (now being repackaged). Due to Steven Spielberg’s upcoming film ‘Warhorse’, the corresponding book has become Egmont’s very own ‘Twilight’. Other successful books are the ‘GONE’ series, as well as ‘Mr. Gum’ and ‘Lemony Snicket’. Egmont has obviously also followed the Paranormal trend, as seen through ‘The Dark Divine’ books (by Bree Despain). They also have an Angel trilogy coming out.
I decided to probe further into the 2005 decisions to break them down a bit:
I can tell you all these things and then I can also tell you that the minute the "right" project lands in that same inbox--even if it contains any of the above--but it blows them away, they'll offer for it.
'The Vagina Monologues'
This is the first issue dating from May 1994. A4 size, 8 pages long it is characterised by a stark and visually striking approach and an uncompromising rhetoric.
That being said, if I could only retain two books on homebrewing, there is no question that it would be these two. Get either one or both of them and you won't be disappointed.
As a little girl I felt ostracized at times from all the other children in our school mainly because of my mother’s undesirable reputation but also for the fact that we were poor. I didn’t understand why people looked down on us when I tried so desperately to be accepted by the other children. Even some teachers treated me as "white trash." Now, years later, I have seen the same thing repeat itself over and over and over. As a teen I observed the "white" folks looking down on the "colored" folks as they searched for the bathrooms labeled "Colored" and "Whites." We were told to not use the water fountains marked "blacks" and in my heart I struggled feeling guilty for loving them. I just didn’t know any different. There was much confusion! God has not allowed me to forget those days of hurt because He wants it to be placed as a bridge from my heart to others. It helps me to love more and to make peace, if you will. There must always be a peacemaker. Are you a peacemaker or are you the opposite?
Let’s face it, you don’t want it to be legal because it less dangerous than alcohol, and you don’t really care about the possibility of reducing gang involvement in it. You want to smoke it, plain and simple. Stop bullshitting me with your pseudo-logical arguments and claims that it is for the good of society or the nation. Say it with me, “I want to smoke weed, and I don’t want it to be illegal for me to do that”. I would respect everyone a lot more if they would at least cop to that more explicitly, and would appreciate it if they started all of their tirades against prohibition with it.
Devon is a fifteen-year-old soccer star who makes good grades and has a bright future. That is, until she puts her newborn baby in trash bag and throws her away in a trash can outside her apartment. After tries to explain what led Devon to this tragic outcome. We follow along as Devon is arrested, goes to trial, and spends time locked up. We also learn about her mother, who had Devon when she was sixteen, and how Devon strives to be nothing like her.
The Beldings were scandalized years ago when a creative produced a commercial the client hadn't approved, bought time and ran it at midnight on a tv station in Palookaville, Nebraska so it would qualify, and then actually won a Belding for it. He was eventually exposed for the fraud, and it resulted in a complete overhaul of the Belding rules and requirements. The show ambled on for a few more years, then basically died because no one cared anymore.
My dad had already dug up most of the red potatoes, but the rest of the Yukon Golds, the Banana Fingers and Purple Peruvian potatoes all needed to be dug up. We got them all out except for the Purples.
This method works by a chemical reaction between aluminium, salt and bicarb soda. Put the plug in the kitchen sink. Lay a piece of aluminium foil on the base of the sink and add your silverware. Pour in enough boiling water to cover the silver.
Dark Force for the adults, aka dark beer
This weekend was the 25th Game Day hosted by Ron, one of the members of my ol' gaming group.
But then again, you also got bullied if you were timid and fat. Anything that made you different made you a target. I can only imagine the torment a young adolescent or young college student faces if a bully finds out you are gay.
*Have you ever had anything removed from your body? ummm, do children count. haha , and teeth
'Me,' Mike says.
Users are instructed to insert the open end into their anus when they feel a fart is coming. This should eliminate any unwanted sound farts tend to produce.
12:24 Thursday 5 April 2012 Nunhead
It's interesting to note that I was not raised like this, even remotely. Not that I was abused or anything like that, but I can recall many, many more times that I was spoken to disrespectfully as a small child and even an older child than respectfully. I don't have to go in to it here, but suffice to say, although we had a culture of love and affection, we did not have a culture of respect and kindness. I was ridiculed, told directly and indirectly that I didn't know what I was feeling, shamed, the works. In my family of origin, fear and shame were the great motivators. But, you know that can only get someone so far.
Now people ask how do we fix this? The wealthy and those who have not fallen off of the employment wagon say there is no problem. Those that say that either have no heart or do not care about fellow humans or are undereducated. This how I would fix it. I would tax or charge corporations fees for sending jobs to other countries, instead of giving tax beaks for shipping jobs overseas like they are getting now. I would also make it a law that the C.E.O.’s can not own stock, that way they do not make decisions for their own gains. Instead of bonuses for the management I would implement a law that would only allow profit-sharing for all the workers, from the janitor to the president. Do not think this is wealth distribution, heck it’s the people under management who make the companies the goods to sell for profit.
And then, yesterday afternoon, Sir Paul Stephenson resigned!
forward-bending movement, such as Ardha Baddha Padma Paschimottanasana (Half-Bound Lotus Seated Forward Bend).
you of my brother, now dead but scared of life yet
Joe Ely @ 3rd & Lindsley * presented by the City of Austin
Grits tends to operate on the assumption that most folks are acting in good faith until they give me reason to believe otherwise. This bizarre, corrupt episode makes me call such assumptions into question. It would never occur to me that local juvenile judges might so brazenly abuse their authority, though I guess after the judge in Pennsylvania was convicted for taking kickbacks for sending youth to a private facility, one shouldn't be surprised. Even so, I must admit, I am.
“I encourage you to be attentive to something that was positive in all those scandals in a sense that it really demonstrated a sea change in responsibility,” Emmert said yesterday.
Let's see how you combine your different stamp sets to get more versatility out of them!!!
Ghost 1: So he didn’t see you?
But then JW (who had come home from studying to assist with this now certain disaster), had an idea.
In recent months I have decided that I do enjoy a pet of a certain kind. Birds...the babies though. Not the mean Mommas who want to peck your head off for even looking at their babies.
The main image panels on the front of the card are from the Hero Arts Simply Handmade Set. The inside scripture is from Sweet and Sassy Stamps and is just one of their beautiful scripture selections.
As I explained above the rich and the ruling class do not share the same interests as the poorest in society and the workers the working class’s if you like. The workers wish to improve their life their pay, conditions and living standards all the time while the rich 1% look to hang on to their wealth and only look to invest when they can see a profit opportunity and increasing their already vast wealth’s.
Banks have pooled resources and cooperated to gather intelligence after learning of plans to picket 99 institutions and companies, followed by what organizers have described as an 8 p.m. “radical after-party” in an undetermined Financial District location.
Things weren't always so rosy for Rupert. At the beginning of the film, Rupert and his pal and trainer Jimmy (Dick Tracy's Dilemma) Conlin as vaudeville performer Joe Mahoney, are getting kicked out of their apartment for never having paid rent for six months! Their agent's girlfriend is totally bored as he tells them there's no work for a squirrel! It ain't box office, and she's got more important things to do!
We all manage to ignore the electricity pylons to our left and the main road some distance to the right.
Ennio Morricone The good, the bad & the ugly I
Additionally, after a push from my wonderful cousin Marsha, I set a few treadmill goals for myself during the month of January. I wanted to run my fastest 1, 2, & 3 mile times thus far.
For some tips and inspiration on how to take part in the Challenge then check out Kasmira’s post from last year here.
I would love to hear thoughts on this from Jews.
The book began as a vague idea which I dreamed up in conversations with Val Brathwaite, the brilliant art editor at Bloomsbury. I had no story, and no idea of what the setting or the style would be; I just knew that I wanted to do an illustrated adventure story, with a picture every few pages and a full-page one in every chapter. At first I planned a fantasy - I had a particular illustrator in mind, and thought I could come up with a tale of magic and monsters which would suit his style. But I thought and thought, and no story appeared. Magic just didn't seem to be my thing. Monsters, however, I definitely wanted to do. One of the few rules I stuck to while writing the Mortal Engines quartet was that there were no monsters; there are no weird unearthly creatures in that future world, and certainly no non-human intelligences (unless you count the Stalkers, but even they were human once). I rather fancied a chance to fill a book with fabulous beings, and over the years I'd even doodled a few, like this Friendly Crab.
What it Involved:
It was bedtime for the girls, so we sent them to change into their pajamas and brush their teeth. A lot of giggling and squealing came from that end of the house, but it's not unusual, so we didn't think twice about it. Then Children A and B came to say that C had thrown everything off the top bunk. That's where A sleeps. She has a lot of stuffed animals and blankets up there, so adult intervention was required at this point. And neither A nor B were in their pajamas.
The protagonist does not wear uniform like the other cops, telling us that he is a higher rank and is good at his job. He wears sunglasses and a suit to make the audience admire him for how cool he is, he is silent throughout the opening sequence and doesn’t say anything too the other policemen, which tells us that they may not get a long, and whilst he may be the protagonist, he might not be very liked in his profession, and gives the impression that he is more like a badass than a hero. Which due to the ideology of the film the audience could guess that they would find out why the other policemen don’t like him, they could also figure out that the protagonist will either catch or kill the antagonist.
Now, looking ahead at the Millennium, if the multihusband-multiwife system is re-introduced among the people and becomes the marriage model for those thousand years, we end up with people who will live just as long as Adam and Eve and will be just as fertile and produce just as many offspring as they did, but with one exception: the first thousand years started with two people only, while the seventh thousand years will start with a vast multitude of people. A thousand years of such peace, progress and posterity will overflow this planet with people. When this planet is filled to the brim with people, the very next year the population will more than double, requiring a second planet upon which to reside. Each succeeding year the population explosion will require more and more planets for all the people. We look at all the planets in the heavens and wonder what they are for, just floating around, supposedly not serving any purpose. Well, it may be that they will find a very important use in the Millennium.
Seton Infirmary, a red brick Colonial Revival building with four stories, forty beds, seventeen private rooms, eleven wards, and quarters for the Sisters opened on May 28, 1902. Naturally, there was a big ceremony to celebrate the opening, but in the middle of it the hospital’s first patient, an African-American woman who was about to have a baby, was admitted.
I wanted to be a performance artist like Karen Finley and perform crazy monologues of the id with my tit out. I wanted to be naked on stage. I was a narcissist.
What is Prayer?
This is going to be a reassuring, although perhaps confusing, post. I was reading queries tonight and someone mentioned that they were, as per my instructions from another post, querying me with a finished manuscript. And that reminded me that I had recently signed up a client who had queried me with only part of her manuscript complete. And that reminded me that I had within the last few years signed and sold two new writers based on queries that were not very strong, technically speaking, and didn't have the elements I like to see, like comp titles, but just had *something* about them that appealed to me; in one case a fun, confident voice, and in the other, good sample pages.
“We are unfazed by any effort to undermine the peace talks, and the parties are committed to work for a negotiated solution to the Mindanao conflict,” chairman Seguis said.
The drones will be limited to 400 feet in altitude and must remain in sight of the operator, much like a remote control toy airplane frequently seen at local parks.
Explored?
silvana: As far as the world knows, going out for french food is worth $100 to silvana, and helping rape survivors is worth $0
Thanks 911R for the nudge to get back in here and update everyone. This blog was meant to be an accountability tool to keep me reaching for the goal so your nudge is just the right thing for me. I am not promising weekly posts again for a while though. There just isn't that much going on to post about. I do have a few things to talk about now though.
Film: Manhattan by Woody Allen
Do I think school has value? To quote JTG, School may have value, just not supreme value. School could be just a waste of time til you are an adult, can work and not burden other adults. Schooling is not so much about education as it is about obedience and learning only the basics.
staying up far too late
Happy Halloween! I am sure those of you who celebrate are planning to take lots of photos of the festivities.
I want a president who prays to the One True God. Who reads the Holy Bible, believing it’s the the only inspired word of God and not unholy books like the Book of Mormon. A man whose prayers I know God hears. A man of God who hears from God. (John 10:27) Not a man who believes he may one day be a god himself.
Ale Stars at The Local Taphouse saw in the festive season last night with a joyous celebration of good company, good cheer and plenty of good beer. Seasonal and Christmas Ales was the theme and the room was filled with the now unmistakable ‘air of Ale Star’ – packed to overflowing with spirit and friendship and chatter and hand-shaking and the sudden need to employ the use of a microphone for the host to be heard.
On another note, the way that authority is established and enforced often times can effect how we act or react to it. If we are driving our car down the road obeying the rules and posted speed limits and we are pulled over by a policeman before the policeman even reaches our window a multitude of thoughts may cross our mind, from thinking what in the world am I being pulled over for, to this guy must be short on meeting his quota or even feeling nervous about some infraction that you may have committed while in a daydream and simultaneously driving. However, once the officer reaches the window how you feel about being under authority will come to the surface when you respond to the officer.
SCC: Your plot is all too scarily believable, but, of course, those exact right ingredients for your explosive mix would have to be in place for this to happen in real life, (which is hopefully unlikely). However, do you think that we, as a society, are in real danger of creating a situation like this, by making our young people powerless, disenfranchised and demotivated to engage with the world?
As soon as I saw a sweetroll in Skyrim for the first time I immediately exclaimed ‘That’s a Gugelhupf!’ Since then I’ve been meaning to do this video and now I finally got round to it! A Gugelhupf is a very popular cake that comes from the German-speaking regions (which is where I come from) and comes in sweet as well as savoury varieties. I realised that many people might not know about this cake and would never have the joy of baking their own sweetroll. And that’s just unacceptable!
Dimpled fingers will not reach for my hand,
The Petit Threes went off without a hitch.
If SEGA can make sure the controls work, I’m totally down for Yakuza: Dead Souls. I’m happy to see the leveling system return, excited to see what the confirmed hostess clubs are like in the middle of Z-Day, and can’t wait for a zombie to tear off his shirt in slow motion to reveal a rockin’ back tattoo.
These are the steps I used to create each image:
toes scrunched in the sand,
If you and your partner are so visibly in love and companionship that no one can help but see it, rest assured the SA sees it too. What's more fun than helping loving people? If you're alone or with friends (whom I'm sure you love--just saying there's a difference), dress with style. I am NOT talking about expensive labels. I am NOT talking about being Parisian chic. I'm talking about looking pulled together so that YOU feel confident. My most beautiful experiences in Hermès all happened when I wasn't dressed up (in Hermès or anything else)--a simple skirt, a simple leather jacket, a Longchamp or Coach bag.
I've used these black trays over and over again, what a great purchase and I got them from Nell Hills of Atchison, KA. That would be Mary Carol Garrity's interior design shop. I have all her books and just love her decorating concept.
Shianne made the brilliant observation this morning that "our house smells so much better," and Mikayla marveled that we still had cold cereal left.
Shirt - YesStyle
so it rises
J: Can you describe Brigitta in one word?
Playing with Graveyard, who are quite popular (for good reasons) there should be quite a few people we will turn on to us instead. Unfortunately we have not yet got the budget, or the time onstage, to perform the gig with the stage production as we have envisioned it but we will make the most out of it. Playing wise we will play some songs from the EP but mostly new stuff and considering no one outside the band have heard these songs it’s going to be a win-over-the-crowd performance which I am confident we will do!
Next came relocation. Whitehorse was sent to the Bay area to learn a vocation, then was pressured to stay and work. During this time, she went to Alcatraz, two months after the initial takeover in 1969. This came at the time of Black Panthers and protests of the Vietnam War. San Francisco offered an education.
You'd think we'd had enough by this point, wouldn't you? But how could we leave before witnessing a 'vampire' facelift??! This procedure was doubley intriguing for me. Obviously, the inner goth was awakened at the very mention of a vampire, but also because the procedure doesn't involve injecting any foreign bodies into the skin. Known professionally as PRP (Platelet Rich Plasma), a vampire facelift involves the doctor taking blood from the patient, spinning it around to separate the plasma and then injecting your own plasma back into your skin. Susan, my microdermabrasion nurse, was desperate to have this done even though, in her own words, "you look a little bit like a frog for a few days afterwards". Apparently it is the only procedure which lifts the eyelids and attacks the fine lines just under the eyes. We plucked up the courage to have a quick peek at this one before we left. I was glad to see that the needle looked a little shorter, but the whole concept of having someone jabbing about my eye with any kind of needle gives me the willies...
This basically means that as your foot strikes the ground, the impact can cause hemolysis (damage or death) to your red blood cells. You do regenerate your blood cells, but excessive hemolysis can cause your iron level (hemoglobin) and iron stores (ferritin) to drop.
With the start of 2010, the solar Light Energies caused pains and pressure in one area in the left (from the old 3D system of duality–female) side of my head/skull. My entire scalp and skull felt bruised and was sore constantly. The previous and familiar “Ascension Flu” solar symptoms had eased considerably with some of them gone entirely, but in 2010 it was painfully clear they were now focused in my/our heads, brains, and brain glands (Pituitary and Pineal primarily). With the larger solar flares/CME in 2010, 2011, and 2012 my body still experiences chills like when you have a fever, but my head has hurt with tremendous inner pains and pressures (not “headaches”) nearly constantly. Even though this head pain and pressure is constant it increases and diminishes in waves. The head pain is always there but sometimes much more painfully so than at other minutes, hours, days and nights.
The end of Ms Wente's column reveals a further source of Ms Wente's information. That would be the Autism Speaks video, "Autism Every Day", which Ms Wente describes as "a glimpse of a day in the life of autism parents". She fails to see "Autism Every Day" as a glimpse at what autistic children have to endure, every day, when they are seen as appalling burdens, when they're talked around and shunted around as though they're non-sentient props. Ms Wente demonstrates that when you dehumanize autistics enough, as Ms Lewis so proficiently does, right down to pulling our teeth if we don't behave, then we disappear altogether, so that the only humans Ms Wente can perceive in "Autism Every Day" are the parents.
The institution of marriage has been completely obliterated by gender queers. This is a term I plan to use more regularly here.
into the garden early one morning
At best I probably could have also finished Elixir and gotten through Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde, if I hadn't lost that day.
Pre-heat oven to 325 degrees and line two 12-cup muffin pans with cupcake liners.
Have I got that right? I think I do. So let’s deconstruct these premises and demonstrate why this ever-so popular argument is really just another lazy, uncritical, decontextualized, factually-deficient and hypocritical canard.
The first goal is to load inventory. It currently takes about an hour to research, photograph and write a description for each item. But, wait! How did I ever acquire so much inventory when I never had a store? I’m like a little bird collecting little shiny objects and curious. I think they’re unique. Hope others do to.
Robert L. Horohoe, 31, New York, N.Y.
One of Mozilla’s major projects this year will be the development of a tech preview browser that conforms to Microsoft’s Metro UI. A peek inside the wiki page reveals that the first version is designed to use existing Win 32 libraries to avoid having to completely port the current set to WinRT. The new front-end’s language is still under debate, as is the question of how the existing Firefox UI should change to conform to Metro’s rules.
From the Rock and Rollers of the 1950s to the Ravers of the 90s, we should not forget all the brilliant art and human potential that has been unleashed by rebels butting against oppressive ways that rigidly bound people into narrow patterns of behaviour, alienating and often destroying anyone that differed from an oppressive norm. Individualism may have damaged community, but it allowed the potential of people to be who they wanted to be, and we should not forget that. Such liberty was hard-won.
The ring in the lower wing is not an onion ring but a chain tatted over a ring and joined back to the base of the ring. To hold the chain in place, it is joined to the top of the ring, in this case, with a Catherine Wheel join. I made the antennae with long twisted picots.
I don't agree with everything John Derbyshire says but but he can sometimes produce some very prescient comments and, to quote from one of his various essays on the British Empire “When the Empire got properly into its stride, humanitarianism was a major driving force. Slavery was abolished throughout Britain's possessions in 1834, and much of the work of the Royal Navy through the middle decades of the 19th century was devoted to the suppression of slave trafficking by peoples of other nations- including this one (the USA). The British colony of Sierra Leone was founded as a refuge for freed slaves, a dozen years before Liberia. The drive to eliminate slavery was fueled by evangelical Christianity, which, in the form of missionary activity, continued to be an important element of the imperial thrust well into the 20th century, especially in Africa.”
In order to maintain the necessary continuity for my new phase of regular and responsive blogging, here is a quick summary of what has been happening in my life during these recent days of radio silence.
Most of the Sharpies were dried up. Tossed.
The hosts made much fuss about their new ale, billed as a "dark IPA" and named, following a public competition, "Perfect Storm". This is an experimental blend of Leann Folláin and O'Hara's IPA (how very Mikkeller!) and it's a battle that the stout is winning: a big sweet chocolate hit dominates the taste with only a mild fruitiness backing it up. For the next iteration I'd suggest seriously ramping up the IPA levels in the blend, and then dry-hopping in the cask (but I would say that).
In 1998 I was also very active with Cystic Fibrosis Awareness. I had a website that started out being for Heather and Holly and also for educational purposes. I was chairmen of the local Great Strides Walk to benefit the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation. I did this up until 2003. In 1998, I was also very active on a list-serv called Cystic-L. My goal at that time was to network with families, gain information and spread awareness.
3) There are those who compromise with culture and are temporarily protected, and those who stand firm with Christ to their temporary detriment. Written during the height of Roman imperial and pagan worship, Revelation shows us that risk of persecution is not a legitimate reason to sin. Revelation was written to both encourage suffering Christians, and to strongly warn those compromising their faithful witness. We would do well to heed the warnings.
A forged 500 francs note passes from person to person until it reaches Yvon, an honest young man. Unaware of the fact that the note is forged he tries to spend it and gets arrested.
This Has Been Another RubyTime Production
Some day he’ll return,
I just can't let it
Also, bear in mine that BYOB doesn’t stand for Bring Your Own Box. Let’s see, what does wine in a box say – it’s a lot of cheap wine and it’s in a BOX. Might as well just go with bottles of wine in paper bags.
POC: Martha, Mickey, River (as Mels).
Blackalicous
But that’s reality TV, and that’s what happens when the public gets to vote. Democracy can be so cruel.
Grayson was in love with me.
After my slip that morning, I spent the next hour or so making a point of talking to Dr. Pip and Dr. Polly as I brought each of the dolls out for their turn in the examining room. Much to my relief, Pip eventually began parroting this manner of address as well. In some respects it seems like such a little thing, but at the moment these little things are what we can do. One day Ava and I will be able to have those conversations with Polly and Pip where we will talk about history and statistics and the reproduction of inequalities. For now, though, we have to try and show them what could be possible and hope that through this showing they learn to imagine and work for what the world should be instead of accepting as good enough what the world has already been.
When I starting craving fish tacos a week ago, I kept thinking to myself that Son wouldn't like it, Daughter #2 would probably pick out all the green, and Daughter #1 might complain about the messiness of eating it. (Daughter #1 is a meticulously neat eater.) The level and noise from the complaints pretty much made me decide that making the fish tacos really wouldn't be worth it at all, so I sort of put it on the back burner. But the craving never quite disappeared. In fact, the craving continued, intensified, and gradually became something I could no longer ignore. I decided that TODAY I would ignore all potential detractors and instead just MAKE MY FISH TACOS and the rest of the detractors could just be hungry. I did what I wanted to do and no one could stop me.
7 Hamburger Lady 7:29
Avery Brewing Company Salvation
Johannesburg-listed Impala Platinum, the world’s second-biggest platinum producer, bowed to pressure last month to surrender half its Zimplats unit, although details of the transfer have not yet been worked out.
Early on, I decided that my overriding goal would be to improve, to keep pushing myself. That’s why I write across genres and formats. That’s why I write humor and horror and romance and suspense. That’s why I write across age and race and region and gender and species.
Donohue's book is narrated by both Julia and Anna, alternating chapters. Although initially I felt more connected to Anna, Julia's narration gave her character more depth and she was also easily likeable. This was a fast and fun read and a women's fiction book that is enjoyable and entertaining.
4 stepped
How would the addition of a slight crunch, like of hemp seeds, have affected that plate?
I went through files in the office and filled three bags! I burnt the old bank statements and other documents that people who might want to steal our identity would find helpful but the rest was just junk!
But is he really? I doubt that David Cunliffe believes what he says with respect to sound economic policy. Any survey of the economic literature would lead you to conclude that:
Christopher Plummer, Beginners
Sure, there were things that we never fully got used to being the school girls we were raised to be but even those somehow shocking stuff were less and less disturbing after a while. Or rather some of us found ways to avoid looking at what we don’t want to see or not to think about what we don’t want to think about. We learned to be girls scouts and know how to work around a potential problem.
What a wonderful Canadian performer. This man has gone along ways with his career. He performed many of his impersonations that he has done over the years. He portrayed Ed Grimley, Giminy Glick and Franck the Wedding Planner to name a few. He also did his impression of Katherine Hepburn, Liz Taylor, Richard Burton and even Betty Davis. He had the audience in stitches throughout his 1 and half hour performance.
Nate: (pause) No, I don't think that's it.
-thunderstorm
The Angels Share-Bourbon Barrel Aged: 12%
Gradually, these brave men and women won the hearts and minds of villagers, who for generations had found solace in the chanting of local shamans and the worshiping of pagan gods. Over the past century, the Christian faith has passed down from generation to generation despite the government’s brutal persecution against Christians in the 1960s and 1970s. In those villages, Christianity has taken root and become a part of the local heritage. It is as indigenous and life-sustaining as qiaoba, a popular buckwheat cake. During my visit there, I never felt that the locals had embraced a foreign religion. It blended seamlessly with the local cultures. Villagers held their services led by local leaders in their native tongues, and celebrated their Eucharist or Christian holidays in a way that they knew the best—local delicacies. It definitely had a distinctive Chinese identity.
Oookay. For those of you who've already read THE EXILE several times (and _thank_ you, btw! The editor tells me that the book is still hovering around the top of the NYT list--at #2 next week--and we're still beating the author of Captain Underpants, which gratifies me deeply), and are beginning to write me, wanting to know When Is The Next Book Coming Out....
Peter Zuidema has been working in the field of digital design and usability since 1993 and worked in the design lead for project for major companies like CMG, Logica, Heineken, NYU, the Rutgers University, broadway musicals, BMW, Tourism Boards, governments, law agencies, marketing firms, media studios and Theme Parks. And besides design and web development, he also owns his own photo and media studio. He lives right now near Philadelphia and New York in Pennsylvania. Peter was nominated by IBM and ComputerWeekly as one of the best new IT-bloggers of 2011.
We don’t see them often today, but here’s a survivor, above the steps to the platforms at North Ealing station in west London. I wonder if it has been there since the station opened in 1903. Back then, this suburban station was on the first above-ground section of London’s Underground to run electric trains. It was in the van of modernization, in other words, but if the electric trains seemed to look forward to a new age, the letterforms on this sign seem to look backwards to the time of Queen Victoria and steam railways.
Except it was too big, taking up too much space in the sink and making it impossible to empty it into the compost pail without dumping grossness on the floor. The MiL remarked wistfully that when she was a girl and everyone still did dishes by hand, every hardware store carried strainers that fit into the corner of the sink. Well, every hardware store doesn't carry them now, but Amazon does. So I bought one, and though washing dishes certainly didn't cease to suck, at least valuable real estate in the sink has been restored and there are a lot fewer egg shells on the floor.
Fresco Application: Apply one coat of the recommended primer followed by two finishing coats of Fresco.
Til then, let's discuss artwork. I've spent most of the week working on some custom artwork for the nursery. Here's a peek.
Being OK with those moments that don't feel good...even embracing them?
“But you haven’t finished your burger . . .”
Blair’s controversial and well-known association world-famous oil despot Nursultan Nazarbayev, the President of Kazakhstan adds another point of contact between three men. The fact that Najib is connected via the marriage of his daughter into the Nazarbayev family gives him plausible access to Blair’s ‘consultancy services’. Another coincidence that is too glaring to brush aside.
I know that Lisa someday found her true love. I know that she found somebody who would take the time to listen to her dreams, and I know that she lives in a house by the sea with her dogs, books, music and true love.
I recently wrote a post from my time as a pest controller where I discussed a lady's fear of cockroaches. Phobias are always good to hear about as they are both cruel and funny, like giving Kendal Mint Cake to an elderly aunt with badly fitting dentures.
What makes for effective social media promotion? There are a great deal of answers to that question but the simple summary is that regardless of whether you are working on music promotion for a band or shoe promotion for a shoe store, social media has to be a factor and part of your budget.
The paintings are very beautiful. When I had first put illustrations from this book on my Dreams of Space website (http://dreamsofspace.nfshost.com/) back in the 1990s, there was not as much space art content on the web. The son of the illustrator James Heugh communicated with me about his father's work in 1994. He said:
On Sunday March 25 we blessed Oliver Richard Newman at our church, just a few days shy of 2 months old. It was so great to have my dad fly out for it, also in the circle was Bishop Andrew, our very good friend Jeff Yeager and our home teacher Russ Wilks. For those of you who don't know about baby blessings in the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints I will explain a little. When a baby is born we have an opportunity to give the baby a name and a blessing. The name given during the blessing is the name on the records of the church.
Blowfish has a cold.
A service dog can be trained to:
Take care my friends and God Bless you all!
Am I engaging in false hysteria? Not every movie has a strong lead character. A lot of movies are about weakness or mediocrity or foolishness. In fact, the top romantic comedies in the Rotten Tomatoes list I spoke of in the earlier post are often about inadequate men. So, maybe it’s just the nature of the comedy beast.
(Big, deep breath...) You know how I've been trying to lose weight?
And if you're the mail room boy or receptionist at the agency, it's your fault because you didn't stay late and work on briefs after the creatives had gone to the pub, until you came up with something that made everyone say "Where did this idea come from? Do you want a job in the creative department?"
As per my “Writer’s Claws,” in the year 2012, I am required to write 3 novels/screenplays if I am to succeed. A novel has to be over 50k words and a screenplay has to be 100+ pages. It’s nearly the end of March, and clearly I have been procrastinating.
"We'll just have ham on buttered bread, thank you, " she intoned, virtuously. "There's no need to toast for us."
I recently went to my doctor for my annual exam. This is a new family doctor for me and I really like her. I had intentions of seeing one of the other physicians in the office, but they were not accepting patients. It all turned out for the best though. She listens to me. She understands that I know my own body. When something isn’t right, I know and she listens. It also isn’t necessary for me to arrange an office visit every time I need something or have a problem. Sometimes I can call and she will write the prescription for me or she will return my call and discuss my issue with me over the phone. She calls and reports to me any test results as well. I really like her.
But it turns out only 1 person actually drowned; some 78 people died, 1 drowning, 4 on the ground, and I guess 73 from the impact.
The Draenei thrust the reins of the horses at Creme. “Hold these.” Creme did so and watched as Brulee pulled the packs off of Willow and found one of the stakes that was in the packs, along with a hammer. She deftly struck the stake into the ground, and then held out her hand to Creme for the reins again. Creme led the horses to her, and she tied them to the stake.
Cut into manageable pieces to fit into pasta machine. Flour pieces as needed; if dough is too sticky it will not go through the pasta machine smoothly.
Salvatore B. Calabro, 38, New York, N.Y.
on . . . you guessed it . . . Friday!
i used red thread to pop a little.
I don't consider myself an Artist, and it's unlikely that my collages would ever be gallery quality, but their value to me is greater than any fine work of art. I love it when other people appreciate them, but unlike my writing, they are made mainly for my own viewing. I do enjoy sharing them though, and especially turning people on to the joys of collage-making. If you've never done it, give it a try!
Research has indicated that consumers want greater speed, smoothness and ease of writing than they can find in a traditional ballpoint, but without the smear that is common with a gel pen.
Had she been able to go to this address 30 years ago, it would have answered a lot of questions that she had.. She is now nearly 90 years old and would still like to know why she was given up to the Nuns..
REGULAR SQUARE:
That sent us on a crash course of congenital heart defects and a series of surgeries and treatments that would change our lives. Ellen hates hospitals as much as I do, but you do what you must for your kids.
Because, of course, Nielsen don't do this out of the goodness of their corporate hearts. They sell the information. Publishers pay to be able to see the figures, and figures are not available without payment. So you or I can't see the sales of our books or any competing books, but publishers can. If you propose a new book, the publisher can check how well similar books sell. If you approach a new publisher, they can see how well your last book sold. Which is fine if it sold really well, but if it didn't - perhaps because it was badly marketed, or a similar book by a more famous author came out a week earlier - they may not want to take a chance on your next book.
Finally I combined all ingredients for the crapes in a large mixing bowel and used the hand mixer to beat them together. Until smooth. Line a plate with a paper towel or in my case I used a napkin. My pan was a little bigger so my crapes came out larger, I used a 1/2 cup measuring cup to place the batter into my pan, but if you have a smaller pan or crape pan a 1/4 cup should work. After you put the batter in your pan swirl the pan around so that you cover the bottom completely. Cook until the center is cooked and the edges are lightly browned, then carefully remove them placing them on your plate with a paper towel between each, repeat. When you finish this you can melt your butter sauce. (This could actually be warming up as you finish your last few crapes). Also reheat your fruit, I did this after my last crape by just putting the fruit into that pan until it was hot.
So let’s forget the ropey league form especially as we are away from home and let’s forget talk about how this season as a whole has panned out in terms of team performance and in the signings we’ve made. The inquests, if they are merited, can be deferred for another time, for today is our day in the sun, a day that fans of all clubs should enjoy if they are lucky enough to get there, The FA Cup Final.
FREE GIFT BAGS FOR THE FIRST 100 ATTENDEES
“I think we’re trying to think through exactly how to fill that market,” McNerney told analysts on 25 April during a first quarter earnings call.
Our apologies for not updating for a while...
M & M's (plain, pretzel, peanut...whatever floats your boat!)
Yes, I am wearing the Little Black Dress for sure. It fits a little nicer with 31 more pounds off since I bought it. :)
· November 18, 2011 2:00 AM
Some tweets even referred to the coded messages broadcast by the Free French over Radio London to Resistance fighters in France during the Second World War.
Mobiles are generally one from the many remarkable issues to possess transpired to help us all not too long ago. Your world involving mobile phones has grew up at a very speedier rate. There is certainly rarely any individual who doesn’t employ a mobile phone today. While using appearance of numerous community providers the entire mobile phone circumstances has bought a different momentum. Mobile phone specials range via user to operator. So, it really is constantly an excellent thought to help study a little bit previous to zeroing within with mobile phone providers connected with a particular operator.
of the Belgian newspaper Le Soir, “came to silence a debate on the extreme right at ULB. The academic authorities declared their ‘consternation’ and ‘scandalization’ by this ‘attack against the freedom of expression’ committed at the University of Brussels, temple of debated ideas.”
Energy is a driving force in our lives and in our practice. Brahmacharya is not only guided by it’s previous yamas, but it becomes our the Action principle for those to come.
(Please do not literally start your bio with “follow me because.” Just making sure.)
“But thanks be to God, which giveth us the victory through our Lord Jesus Christ.”
On the up side, I’ve gotten to spend some time hanging around with Jorin Deadeye, who used to pick on me like nobody’s business when we were kids, and didn’t get a whole lot better when we grew up. Everything with him was “Nice job your dad did dooming our people,” and “Damn, you’re a mopey, whiny little bitch” (and granted back in those days I WAS pretty emo, and I CAN’T IMAGINE WHY I WOULD HAVE BEEN KIND OF DOWN ON MYSELF AT THE TIME), and going around calling himself the “warchief” of the Bleeding Hollow clan instead of the chieftain. So I’ve been making a point of just hanging out wherever he’s been pretty regularly, and saying stuff to him like, “So hey, you like my axe? Yeah? Well check it, this is Gorehowl, the blade my dad used to FUCKING ONE-SHOT MANNOROTH and lift the blood haze from the orcs, how ’bout that, huh?” and “Hey, Chieftain, remind me, who’s actually Warchief these days? OH YEAH, SMALL WORLD!” Cue the comically appropriate Earth Online machinima:
I got a shin splint going on. SO I am resting this week and well next week we are on vacation, so why not go ahead and take that week as well.
That news should have started a firestorm of controversy for the Prime Minister for abusing the police in this way, and the RCMP should be reviewing their responses to political interference. Hey, it’s not too late to get mad. You could always call your MP and complain about it… Oh wait.
Anyways a little bit of time went by and we were driving through Carson City and saw the RV dealers, so we decided to go check out some RV's. The kids had a blast going through each one. Jazmin said, I actually think I could do this. So we just day dreamed and talked and day dreamed some more about what it would be like to travel in an RV. We went to the RV dealerships a couple of times to get a feel and day dream.
an avant–garde
Regulars know the story, but I hope you'll forgive me in telling it again.
and the razor’s floating in the River
One other intriguing element to all of this: Colangelo hired Paul Westphal when both were with the Phoenix Suns, then fired the former Suns star partly because the team featuring our beloved Charles Barkley lacked structure and discipline. And who targeted Cousins as the Kings’ biggest problem last season and early this year? It’s still hard to believe, given DeMarcus’ rapid development, but before he was fired after a 2-5 start, Westphal basically targeted Cousins as the Kings’ major problem and pressured management to make a trade. Ouch. Not a good move.
Turkey sandwich, more plum pudding, woe is me…
And it was this activity that would bring Phroney Hale right into our midst for a change.
June 17, 2010 - April 29, 2012
One thing I know from decorating is that there are always limitations. It doesn't matter if your budget is large or small, there are always limitations. We tried to stay within our limitations by doing everything we could ourselves and by keeping things SIMPLE.
As a DMC I will be in the water a lot, to say the least. I will chronical my training on this blog. But, I won’t be taking pictures while I’m acting as a DMC because it’s not appropriate for me to be taking pictures in that role.
On other occasions, Obama has strongly hinted to his gay and lesbian supporters that he is “evolving” to the point where he will support same-sex marriage.
“I learnd from Hussein how to achieve victory while being oppressed.”
Here's what I came up with:
One day, we call a Hillbrow police man for an interview.
From the first few seconds…scratch that, from the moment I read the title, I could tell that this tape wasn’t merely a story, it was an epic. I’m talking Paradise Lost kind of epic.
And still the Conservtiave modernisers tell us that electoral power can only be found in the centre.
I must admit I was apprehensive about writing this story. I know people who have been through much more than I have and I carry a lot of guilt over the success of our IVF if that makes any sense. Especially because it worked first time. But I figure everyone has a different story but that sharing our stories, good and bad we can help each other through unbelievable hardships and successes. They can give us hope and even a kin ship that maybe sorely needed at the time.
I am really looking forward to a great year with a bunch of cute new kiddos!
Alan Titley, one of the pre-eminent critics in Irish, in "The Irish Book Review" noted the accuracy of Moriarty's translations, and my limited ability can verify this. Moriarty does, as Titley praises, enter into the spirit of the texts he gathers, and he resurrects many stories and tells them with vigorous compassion and hard-won wisdom. Rilke, D.H. Lawrence, Ted Hughes, Mircea Eliade, Marguerite Porete, William Law, Thomas Traherne, and Indian (in both senses of the adjective) sources speckle, as veins in quartz, his own integration of other-worldly reflections from around the world and across the centuries. Moriarty's range remains impressive. I am not sure how to build the Bird-Reign after ending this retelling of Irish sources, but I am impressed with his erudition put towards the cause of not self-promotion, as with so many scholars, but the betterment of us all, the weak and the struggling and not only the tenured and the acclaimed. His own decision, decades ago, to leave academia behind for his own vision-quest informs and enriches his work. While critics may scoff at his magpie eclecticism and his gnomic tone, I admit he earns my respect as well as my occasional bafflement. Luckily, a glossary explains most of his coinages, borrowings, and untranslated (in the text) phrases from Sanskrit or Irish.
What are we to make of this critique? To some extent he simply uses America as a foil for France. If Americans are moral, it is because they lack some aspect of French society that leads to immorality, but which makes the French somehow spiritually superior. As for his comments on American love – are European gallantries an answer to an American defect, and were they then? I tend to think not, and to see such elaborate and mannered rituals as part of the historical problem that has led sex relations to where they are today. If the Europeans caused a mess by overfeeding women’s love of flattery and drama, however, the extreme practicality of relations between the sexes in early America may also have contributed to the problem by underfeeding them. While game might be viewed as a kind of modern version of the European gallantries to which Beaumont refers, no amount of game expertise on the part of American men will fix our society without a fundamental shift in women’s behavior.
That icy cold sweat.
I see there will be new puffle toys! What do you think they will look like? Comment below!
I always thought my mom was my best friend. I thought I could tell her ANYTHING and I usually did. It seemed so wonderful to have the love and support of a mother. It seemed amazing to go home at night and have your best friend always there. I always thought she was not passing judgement and was being supportive of my decisions. There were a few times in my life when I felt my mom was dictating too much to me what I could and could not do. I just assumed these were normal “mother knows best” situations.
I'm still seeing a counsellor to help me work through the things that are there, and am receiving support from friends I've made through the school.
But I also thought it would be neat for my great-grandkids to see what my footprints looked like.
KIM: Ok, well that’s about it folks. Special thanks go to Sarah for creating the banners, Dr Maroon for providing a goodly chunk of the writing for this entry, and to everyone who has submitted scripts, built strips, commented and voted. We love you all *mwah, mwah*
The girls get terribly excited about getting those letters in the mail every couple of weeks.
I have learned to distrust speed reading and instant knowledge. Few joys of the mind can compare with the experience of lingering over deft character description, or hovering over a well-wrought passage. “Some people,” said Alexander Pope, “will never learn anything… because they understand everything too soon.”
I am, once again a very happy Audi owner and customer of York Audi - long may this state of affairs continue :)
Serving suggestions for Potato Latkes: a side of applesauce or sour cream and perhaps a plain, thick yogurt.
I hope you are all having a lovely holiday weekend and over-indulging in chocolate goodies. So far my weekend has been eventful but not as anticipated - more later.
Also, Phyllis took the liberty of posting a picture of her Kiwi Bird friend on Face Book (he arrived on Blueberry Hill all the way from New Zealand courtesy of Diane!) and Donna, being an alert sort even at the crack of dawn on a Sunday morning, immediately suggested we have a contest to decide on a name for the bird. You all know how I can't resist a contest, so later today (or at some point when I get around to it) when I have had my coffee and we are all feeling as alert as Donna, I will post the contest on Phyllis's FB page and everyone can put in their 2 cents :) You may put your two cents here in the comments as to what you'd like the prize for the winner to be!
The new constitution ushered in democracy in 1994. Ironically, however, the ANC's model of government - based on the Leninist idea of "democratic centralism" - in terms of which party headquarters dictates to local communities whom they must elect - is causing growing dissatisfaction at local level as the municipal election on 18th May approaches.
This has been a busy week! Sunday evening we took our family pictures - they came out great! During the week we had something every night except Wednesday. Friday night Brad and Emily went on a Daddy/Kid camping trip with our Sunday School class. All of the girls enjoyed a night at Painting with a Twist.
It is a wonderful, meaningful and loving gesture and can sometimes say more than words!
White Balance : Auto
You are a high achiever. You like to challenge yourself, and you get great satisfaction from being the best at something.
I also CAN'T STOP reading, buying, and checking out dystopian themed books (Hunger Games, Delirium, Unwinds, etc-google or good reads dystopian and you will get TONS of good recommendations if you are into that!). My Good Reads page is ridic! recently I have purchased Pandemonium (the second book to Delirium) and Crossed (the second book to Matched). I've also gotten on a major library kick with the dystopian teen fiction, so I'm using all of nap time to READ instead of clean or prep for dinner. Yikes.If you want some book titles or recommendations, let me know. Girlfriend is a reading hooker.
The decisions made by the upper management are not because they “answer” to the share holders. They could care less about anyone who owns less than 15% of the shares. They only answer to themselves and the board of directors. If they were concerned about you or me, they would not give them such huge paychecks after they lay off 20% of the workers. They would not stop on the dividends , they would raise them and cut their own paychecks.
3. Shelly at Sweet Greetings ... this is a hidden gem, this blog! Shelly was part of the 2011 Stamping Royalty (which is how I found her blog) and I can see why! Love her style...clean and simple at its best!
Halo? I mean, “HELLO?” How many people had actually heard of this comic character? Nine and a half out of ten people associated my name with this bright circle round the heads of some holy bastards. What did I get?
All of the planets have one thing in common, though—a white tree.
greyed either side of
EGGLESS CHOCOLATE CHIP COOKIES
Cons: The holiday completely waters down the relationship that was held between the Native Americans and the pilgrims who settled this country, causing people to turn a blind eye to the hardships that were heaped onto these poor natives in the name of our greed. Also, some people eat beets at Thanksgiving. That’s soooooo gross!
nine men are mending road for the government.
As this is going on, my toddler is playing Houdini and maneuvering his little body out of the seat belt in an attempt to stand up in the cart. I’m amazed the kid made it to his second birthday without suffering a brain damaging head injury. In between trying to flip himself out of the cart, he sucks on the metal bars of the shopping cart. Mmmm, can you say “influenza”?
As Bloomberg reports this afternoon GMT, Simon Derrick, head of currency research at Bank of New York Mellon in London, saw an ending in which Berlin voluntarily quits the euro in order to protect the credibility of its own sovereign debt. A revived German mark would rapidly increase in value, but in a note to Mellon clients, Derrick argued that German manufacturers had coped with a strong currency in the past. Berlin might find it more cost-effective to rescue its domestic lenders than to bail out the rest of the euro zone, he said. The Slog’s Frankfurt Maulwurf would agree 100%…..as would most German voters.
And yet...right now Phoebe is fast asleep in our bed. Since the kids are all sharing one room, she finds it difficult to get to sleep, so we put her in our bed until she's comatose. I've just been in to check on her, and found a girly curled up in a ball, fast asleep and dreaming,looking just like she did at about 6 months old. And very, very little.
Ms B was not interested in the wrongs committed by her companion, she wanted us to focus on what was preventing Mr A from moving in.
Tess of the D’Urbervilles
I can't recall him ever saying anything positive about America, unless you include how he's going to "fundamentally transform" it. Yet even then, he is not expressing love of country but love of himself. His constant berating of our country, his perpetual attacks on this country and its citizens, and his stated intention of remaking it are not rooted in patriotism. His is not a desire to improve our system of government; he seeks, I believe quite strongly, to totally destroy it. We, who love our country, know that there are things that are wrong, that aren't working perfectly (and some that aren't working at all), that we've made bad foreign policy decisions, that we are hated by much of the world. But we don't see in that a thing to be reviled, obliterated. We see in that a country that we love, fundamentally, a system of government that might be imperfect but is by far more appealing than any other. We see the good in our country, and we believe--know in our hearts and in our souls--that our country is far more good than bad. It always has been.
No evidence to back this novel claim is supplied, other than McCombes’s unconvincing nod and a wink that this was a “rumour circulating in media circles”. Downfall makes no attempt to explain why, if the claim was true, not a single shred of supporting evidence was uncovered by a police investigation costing £5 million and 40,000 hours of time.
A) 150 gm (nett wt.) sweet potatoes, steamed and smashed
Bad, bad mommy moment = Never Again!
I’ve been tirelessly job hunting for the past few months, and it’s not easy. I think it’s especially difficult when you’re looking into food jobs, internships or other related experience. For those who aren’t graduating, getting food internships can be a little easier if you’re getting course credit for them or willing to work unpaid. So, here are a few resources and internships I have found that might ease the job searching stress for you all.
If I knew you were comin' I'd've baked a cake
You can also put everything together the night before, cover with foil and keep it refrigerated over night. Then bake as directed.
Ye Gods!
Daily prayer: Father, the cares of this world often press in on us and weigh our hearts down. It’s not your desire that we carry this heavy load because You are the Burden Bearer. You use the difficult circumstances of our lives to bring glory to Yourself as You bring spiritual maturity into our relationship with You. There are many situations where we’ve been dealt with unjustly, with unkind words thrown our way. Our typical response; “NOT FAIR!” But Your pattern of returning kindness to those who were hostile toward You serves as a sterling example to us when we’re hurt by other’s words or actions. Our faith is strengthened and our character is sharpened in the torrent of such hurtful circumstances. We must commit them to You and respond in Christian virtue. We invite You to take the evil that Satan hurls at us and turn it into glorious occasion for Your power to be released and healing to take place. It is in the name of Jesus that we pray and believe. Amen.
Oh...and some beautiful bling!
Firstly, you may have noticed that if you ask a stranger to do something—especially to buy something—they tend to balk. Their natural reaction is to question the instruction. To find a reason to disagree with it. The critical mind throws up objections.
Roses doily...as you can see I am keeping both of these.
To look someone in the eye, and consider them worthy of my respect that they are intellectually, emotionally, psychologically and physically capable of hearing my honest opinion about any issue relating to our relationship or of interest at the time.
Next he explained the guests and the format of today's show. We were actually taping two parts of shows. Though much of Le Grand Journal is broadcast live, they pre-record guests who are unavailable in the evening. "How many of you are here to see Seelverstar Stelun?" he shouted. The crowd went cah-raaazy bonkers. They needed no practice on enthusiasm. "Ouaaaaiiis!!!" Girls jumping up and down and screaming, greasy-haired boys shaking both fists up high in triumph. "Qui?" I naively asked the boy next to me. He looked askance at me as if I were Bride of Frankenstein. "Seel-vess-tair Stal-lun."
So no matter what
Iván Meade - Lastly, you have already created a stunning body of work with many mediums and styles. What would you like your legacy to be?
In the Extraordinary Form, this Sunday is Good Shepherd Sunday, the Gospel is St John 10:11-16. In the Ordinary Form, that Gospel is read next Sunday.
- Although this limbo not only challenged it's visitors, but it also allowed fighting, war and more pain.
It's been sunny for the last three days. Even though it's still cold, Spring is in the air. Parisians are sitting outside at cafes, or lying in the brown grass in parks, soaking up the sun. And I have my carte de sejours. For three years.
